                              183 of 997 DOCUMENTS

               Copyright (c) 2000 Thomas J. White Center on Law &
                                   Government
               Notre Dame Journal of Law, Ethics & Public Policy

                                      2000

                       14 ND J. L. Ethics & Pub Pol'y 245

LENGTH: 18518 words

ARTICLE: WHY LAW PERVADES MEDICINE: AN ESSAY ON ETHICS IN HEALTH CARE

NAME: Charity Scott *

BIO:



   * Charity Scott is Professor of Law at Georgia State University College of
Law; Faculty Ethics Fellow, Emory University Center for Ethics in Public Policy
and the Professions, 1994-95; J.D., Harvard Law School, 1979; B.A., Stanford
University, 1973. Professor Scott gratefully acknowledges the fine assistance of
third-year law student Sandra Herron in the preparation of this essay.

 TEXT:
 [*245]

   Law pervades medicine because ethics pervades medicine, and in America, we
use the law to resolve ethical dilemmas in health care.

   Law deals with ethics? Many people react with surprise, amusement, or
cynicism when they see those two words - law and ethics - together in the same
sentence. To many people, the two concepts seem wholly distinct, like the
proverbial apples and oranges, or even radically opposed, as different as night
and day. In medical circles, one senses an antagonism to law, not just to
lawyers. On hospital ethics committees, talk of law as well as lawyers may be
banned from the ethical discussions. On medical rounds, I may be asked to help
the residents and medical students keep a bright line between law and ethics so
that, I am told, they'll know when they're dealing with one and not the other.

   A central thesis of this essay is that there is no such bright line between
law and ethics in America, at least not in medicine. During the second half of
the twentieth century, most difficult issues in health care which have raised
profound ethical dilemmas have been addressed by law. For better or for worse,
law and ethics have been evolving in health care together; hand in glove is
perhaps the more apt simile. The central purpose of this essay is to foster
understanding by both legal and health care professionals about how law has
influenced the ethical evolution of medicine and health care in America during
the past several decades.

   Part I analyzes the relationship between law and ethics generally in health
care. It posits that law reflects a consensus statement by our society on what
we believe to be ethically appropriate behavior, or on how we believe ethical
dilemmas ought to be resolved. Like ethics, law fundamentally asks what,  [*246]
under all the circumstances, would be the right thing to do?  n1 Using several
examples of federal legislation, Part I illustrates how our laws have reflected
our society's evolving views on ethics in professional and business practices in
health care. Unlike ethics, however, law also serves to enforce the socially
agreed-upon views of right and wrong. Paradoxically and unfortunately, when law
becomes the primary enforcer of ethical views, its power can create problems, or
pitfalls, for continued ethical reflection on the very issues that it was called
upon to address in the first place.

   Part II recounts the evolution of medical ethics at the patient's bedside.
Through the lenses of law and ethics, this Part focuses on patients and their
relationships to the professionals who provide them health care. It explores how
law has supported the ethical concepts of patient autonomy and respect for
persons through the legal doctrines of patients' right to consent to and to
refuse medical treatment. Through the example of informed consent doctrine and
our growing obsession with informed consent forms, this Part illustrates how
law's power to enforce an ethical ideal of genuine dialogue between doctors and
patients has created a pitfall for ethical reflection about the actual
conversations between patients and the professionals who care for them.

   Part III examines the recent attention to business ethics in the
administrative offices and boardrooms of health care organizations. Increasing
marketplace competition has prompted health care organizations increasingly to
focus on profits, or at least on financial viability, which in turn has created
ethical dilemmas which in turn have been addressed by law. Focusing on managed
care and the Joint Commission on the Accreditation  [*247]  of Health Care
Organizations (JCAHO), Part III examines the evolution of organization ethics
and corporate health law in the business of health care delivery. All of the
business practices which raise ethical issues that JCAHO now requires a
hospital's business ethics code to address - billing, marketing, patient
admissions, transfer and discharge, conflicts of interest, and compensation
arrangements - are also addressed by health care laws at both state and federal
levels, providing civil as well as criminal sanctions. Part III uses the recent
flurry of corporate compliance programs throughout the health care industry to
illustrate the paradox that law's power and pervasiveness can create pitfalls
for ethical reflection on the very issues that law was called upon to address.

   Part IV proposes an alternative to reliance on law as the primary
articulation and enforcer of ethics in health care. Lawyers have not usurped the
power of health care providers to assume leadership on ethics. The law never
took it out of the hands of health care professionals to strive for the ethical
high ground. Until those in the health care field - individual practitioners to
high-level managers - assert their authority and responsibility for charting the
ethical direction of medicine and health care, law will continue to pervade
their professions and their institutions.

   I. The Relationship Between Law And Ethics In HealthCare

   A. Law as a Consensus Statement onEthics

 While lawyers may suffer some unpopularity, the law still reflects society's
idealism. Immanuel Kant believed that: "The greatest problem for the human
species, the solution of which nature compels him to seek, is that of attaining
a civil society which can administer justice universally."  n2 Justice is an
ethical concept of universal fairness for and among individuals; law is the
vehicle by which a society attempts to achieve this lofty ideal. Oliver Wendell
Holmes observed that: "The law is the witness and external deposit of our moral
life. Its history is the history of the moral development of the race."  n3 Thus
the law reflects what,  [*248]  at any given point in time, society views as
acceptable, ethically appropriate behavior.

   We often enact our moral views in our laws; in effect, we legislate morality.
Looking at our laws is like looking at a snapshot in time of our society's moral
views about how people ought to behave towards each other. Over time we may
change our views as to which behaviors are right or wrong, and we reflect that
change by changing our laws. For example, for some considerable time in our
nation's history we regarded it as morally appropriate for individuals of
different color or gender to be treated differently. We reflected those views in
our laws governing who could vote, who could own property, who could be educated
in which schools, who could marry whom, who could eat or work or live where, and
so forth. Today, our anti-discrimination laws reflect the moral view that it is
wrong to perpetuate those distinctions among individuals in our society.

   In health care, our society has used the law to ask (and answer) questions
about what are ethically appropriate behaviors among those who provide, or
receive, or pay for health care services. Frequently, the law is a reaction to
perceived ethical wrong-doing in health care. As discussed below, federal laws
over the past three decades illustrate how American society has reacted to
perceived or potential ethical abuses in health care by calling for laws to
resolve the ethical conflicts. The legal resolution in effect becomes a societal
consensus statement on ethics, at least for the time being and until the laws
are changed.  n4

[*249]

   1. The 1970s and 1980s: Patient Care and Medical Ethics

 Federal law was used to address an ethical dilemma caused by the shortage in
the 1960s of hemodialysis machines to treat patients with kidney disease. To
allocate these scarce resources in Washington, a group (later dubbed the
"Seattle God Committee") was given authority to decide, according to various
"social worth" criteria, which patients would or would not be given this
treatment. Patients were evaluated according to, among other things: age,
gender, income and net worth, marital status, number of dependents, educational
and employment background, and their "past performance and future potential."
n5 Societal unease about the ethics of this form of health care rationing found
expression in the enactment of the Social Security Amendments of 1972, allowing
Medicare reimbursement for most patients with end-stage renal disease.  n6

   Federal law was enacted in the 1970s to address the ethical issues raised by
the decades-long decision by the U.S. Department of Public Health to deprive
hundreds of African-American men in rural Alabama of available antibiotics to
treat syphilis.  n7 Government officials who authorized the Tuskegee Syphilis
Study viewed it as an opportunity to benefit both scientific research and the
Southern black community.  n8 After the public revelations and congressional
hearings, however, society reacted to what it judged to have been unethical
behavior by enacting national laws to develop ethical standards for the
protection of human research subjects.  n9

    [*250]  In the 1980s, conflicting ethical views about what was appropriate
medical care for critically ill newborns were socially expressed by the legal
controversy over the so-called Baby Doe regulations.  n10 Promulgated by the
Reagan administration, these regulations prohibited hospitals from withholding
life-sustaining treatment from very ill infants solely by reason of their
handicaps,  n11 and allowed the federal government to monitor medical treatment
decisions as potential violations of federal anti-discrimination laws through
twenty-four-hour hot lines and warning notices posted in hospitals.  n12 These
regulations have since been invalidated by the Supreme Court.  n13 Alternative
legislation was subsequently enacted which represented a compromise between the
ethical positions held by those (primarily doctors' groups) who believed such
treatment decisions should largely be left to the discretion of parents and
physicians, and those (primarily advocates for the disabled) who believed that
the treatment decisions should not based on predictions about an infant's future
"quality of life."  n14

    [*251]  That a health care law can represent society's views on ethics was
also illustrated by the 1980s controversy over so-called "patient dumping," or
the practice by many private hospitals of transferring poor or uninsured
emergency patients to public hospitals. Prior to the 1980s, hospitals generally
had no obligation under state and federal law to give life-saving treatment to
emergency patients, or to provide obstetrical care to women in labor, if these
patients could not pay for these services.  n15 Congressional hearings on the
nationwide problem of patient-dumping resulted in the Emergency Medical
Treatment and Active Labor Act.  n16 Prompted by societal concern over
individual patient horror stories, the Act reflected emerging societal agreement
that it was wrong for hospitals to refuse to treat women in labor or patients in
a potentially life-threatening emergency based on their inability to pay.

   In each of these four examples, the activities that gave rise to the public
controversies and subsequent legislation posed important and debatable ethical
questions in health care. Many of the actors at the time did not regard their
actions as ethically problematic, even if others later did. The members of the
Seattle God Committee  n17 and those who authorized the Tuskegee Syphilis Study
n18 believed their activities to be ethical promotions  [*252]  of the public
good. The hospitals who transferred poor patients to public hospitals rather
than treat them did not view it as ethically wrong to decline to give service to
someone who could not pay for it.  n19 Certainly there remain sharply divergent
views about what constitutes the ethical treatment of critically ill newborns.
n20  [*253]  The point is that in each case, the law was called upon to weigh
the merits of the differing ethical positions, to adopt some and reject others
(implicitly if not expressly), and to provide guidelines for what society agreed
(by proxy, through the democratic vote on the legislation)  n21 would be
considered unethical behavior in the future. As a consensus statement on ethics,
the law reflected society's views, at least for the time being, of where the
ethical balance should be struck.

   2. The 1990s: Managed Care and Business Ethics

 Many of the legal controversies involving medical ethics in the 1970s and 1980s
tended to focus on perceived ethical problems arising out of the
provider-patient relationship. In other words, these ethical questions
frequently focused on how those who provide health care services (the hospitals,
doctors, or researchers) should treat those who receive the services (the
patients).  n22 By contrast, many of the ethical conflicts in health care in the
1990s involve the business practices of payers (those who pay for health care
services, such as managed care and insurance companies), which raise ethical
questions about how the payers should treat both patients and providers
(particularly doctors and hospitals).  n23 Throughout the 1990s, providers and
[*254]  patients alike have vociferously expressed their sense of ethical
wrong-doing by insurers and managed care companies who, for example, attempt to
insert so-called "gag clauses" in their contracts with physicians;  n24 who may
try to cut costs by limiting hospital stays down to the point of paying only for
so-called "drive-through" deliveries  n25 and "drive-through" mastectomies;  n26
who may create financial incentives for doctors to deny or limit care  n27
[*255]  or otherwise interfere with the doctor-patient relationship by denying
payment for care that the patient needs and the doctor wants to provide;  n28
who impose restrictions on patients' choice of  [*256]  provider;  n29 who
appear to lack protections for the confidentiality of patients' records;  n30 or
who will not pay for emergency services without a lot of pre-authorization red
tape.  n31

    [*257]  The HMOs and insurance companies who engage in these behaviors do
not view them as wrong or unethical: on the contrary, it is just good business
to try to contain costs and allocate health care rationally. But others in our
society view these behaviors as ethically wrong, unfair, or abusive. And where
do they go when their sense of moral outrage gets strong enough? To the law, of
course. Each of these asserted unethical behaviors has generated calls for
social resolution, principally by legal ban at federal and state levels. In the
past few years, new legislation in Georgia  n32 and other states  n33 has
addressed, or has been proposed to address, many of these issues. Competing
Democratic and Republican proposals for "patient protection" legislation or a
"patients' bill of rights," which have been the focus of so much Congressional
debate over the past two years, also address many of these same concerns.  n34
As was true for the debates over medical ethics in earlier decades, these calls
for legal reform in the 1990s reflect societal judgment about the ethics of many
health care business practices.

   B. Law as Enforcer of Socially Agreed-Upon Values: Law Packs Ethics
WithaPunch

 While law and ethics both focus on questions of right and wrong in human
relationships, they differ starkly in their ability to enforce ethical behavior.
Ethics is aspirational only: it posits ethical ideals for human behavior. If we
say "ought," we mean ethics. By contrast, law provides penalties for failure to
abide by  [*258]  socially-agreed upon ethical norms.  n35 If we say "must," we
mean law. The old adage that "virtue is its own reward" is only partially true:
sometimes the threat of jail time or heavy monetary penalties can provide a more
compelling incentive for virtuous behavior than simple knowledge that one is
"doing the right thing." Law packs ethics with the "punch" of potential
sanctions.

   C. Clarification about the Consensus

 While law often serves these two primary roles - expressing social agreement on
what is ethically inappropriate behavior between individuals, and backing that
agreement up with penalties for violation - two further points are needed to
clarify the nature of this social agreement.

   1. Consensus Reflects General Agreement, Not Unanimity

 First, by societal "consensus" or social "agreement" this essay does not mean
to suggest that everyone in society agrees that the ethically correct resolution
has been expressed by the law in every case. Plenty of people obviously will
disagree. We live, after all, in a pluralistic society where uniformity of
opinion is virtually impossible. What is meant by "consensus" is less than
unanimity and more a sense of general agreement. Whether a bare majority or a
substantial majority, "consensus" in this essay means a democratic resolution we
have agreed to abide by in our social contract, even if individually some (or
even many) of us believe a particular resolution is wrong.  n36

[*259]

   2. Law Sets Ethical Minimums, Not Maximums

 Second, through the law, our society does not attempt to agree upon all conduct
which is ethical, and all conduct which is unethical. Law performs a much
narrower function. In the universe of ethics, right and wrong behaviors lie
along a spectrum, with ethically good or even ideal conduct at one end (perhaps
we could agree to put honesty, loyalty, generosity, altruism, and respect for
others at this end) and ethically bad behavior at the other end (most of us
might place murder, lying, cheating, and stealing, for example, at this end).
Much of human behavior lies somewhere in the middle, where there is significant
division of social opinion as to whether or to what extent it may be right or
wrong, good or bad, acceptable or unacceptable. Society often uses law to
identify those behaviors primarily at one end of the spectrum: those behaviors
about which there is general agreement that they are unethical, wrong, or
unacceptable.  n37 In our society, we often express our consensus about behavior
being ethically wrong by making it illegal.  n38 But that leaves much conduct -
perhaps  [*260]  most human conduct - simply not addressed by law, and over
which there may be significant differences of opinion.

   By addressing what we have generally agreed is wrong behavior or bad actions,
the law sets the legal minimums for behavior; it does not address the ethical
maximums. The law provides sanctions for wrongdoing; it does not tend to provide
rewards for doing good or even sanctions for failing to do good.  n39 The law
will punish you if you hit a person and leave him bleeding in the street; but if
you are walking down the street and happen to see someone lying and bleeding in
the gutter, the law will not penalize you if you walk on by and fail to help him
out.  n40 American law does not require you to be the "Good Samaritan," nor
reward you if you are. That is the province of ethics - it goes beyond the law.

   D. Too Much Law in the Discourse of MedicalEthics?

   1. Translating Moral Problems into Legal Problems

 Some people may readily agree that law is the principal forum where our society
debates ethics, and yet they may still deplore that this is so. The ethicist
Daniel Callahan has recently complained about the "elevation of moral judgments
of the courts as the moral standards of the land," and argues:



    Unfortunately, because we do let the law legislate considerable morality, or
use moral arguments to overcome existing bans, a great deal of the work of
ethics ends up being done in courtrooms and enshrined in legal decisions...
[Law] may be the best institution we have [to arbitrate moral questions], but it
is a poor substitute for moral consensus and public debate on ethics.  n41

    [*261]

 Certainly, there are problems with our society's translation of moral problems
into legal ones. Some commentators have said that law is coercive, and tends to
end public debate over morality.  n42 Some may wish that the law considered more
fully what it means for individuals to be members of the community, or that the
law did not focus so narrowly on individual rights.  n43 And yet for better or
for worse, we have not vested any other forum besides the law with sufficient
social clout and political authority to decide these ethical questions. We may
let our universities, places of worship, the media, public opinion surveyors, or
other social institutions raise these questions for us, but not resolve them.
Only law is given this authority, reflecting a social agreement to abide by the
resolutions it comes up with.

   2. Law's Power to Enforce Creates Ethical Pitfalls

 One serious problem with "legislating morality" is that when law pervades
ethical inquiry and backs its resolutions up with the punch of potential
liability, people frequently focus solely on avoiding the punch. In responding
to the so-called "chilling effect" of the law, some of us sometimes overreact
and assume that we must do something, or must not do something, because we think
that's "what the law says," whether it makes any medical sense or even common
sense. Often lay people may not know what the law says, or assume they know but
in fact are wrong, but they think, "never mind, it's better to be safe than
sorry," and so they engage in behaviors, or avoid behaviors, in order to comply
with what they blindly, and perhaps erroneously, assume the law  [*262]
requires of them.  n44 This is the essence of "defensive medicine," sometimes
reflecting misunderstandings about the law and nearly always illustrating
concern more about whether one can get sued than about whether one is doing the
right thing.  n45 Many lawyers, by the way, are also culpable on this score.

   The very power of the law can create pitfalls for real ethical reflection in
other ways. Paradoxically, more law can result in less ethical debate. When we
focus on the law, we tend to lose sight of the ethical underpinnings for it. In
trying to focus on the "letter of the law," we often lose sight of its "spirit."
When law becomes pervasive, we often forget about the original ethical questions
that prompted the legal resolutions. We also tend to forget that generally, the
law sets only the floor for ethical behavior, and that we have come to societal
consensus only on those behaviors which fall below that ethical level. We get so
focused on making sure that our behavior does not fall below that floor - that
we cannot be held legally liable for something - that we do not examine whether
our behavior is reaching far enough toward the ethical high ground. We worry
only about avoiding legal accountability, not about promoting ethical
responsibility. Our obsession with the law - or more particularly, with avoiding
law's punch - means that we tend to substitute our conformity with the legal
minimums for our need to reflect on the ethical  [*263]  maximums. We are too
quickly satisfied that our compliance with these legal minimums was all that
ethics required us to do.

   II. Medical Ethics at the Bedside: Law and the Recognition of Patients'Rights


 This Part examines law's influence on medical ethics at the bedside, in
particular on the doctor-patient relationship, and will illustrate how law's
power has created pitfalls for ethical reflection through the example of
informed consent forms.  n46 The law's recognition of patients' rights to
consent to and to refuse to receive medical treatment is solidly founded on
ethical considerations and, it is argued, reflects an emerging societal
consensus over how the ethical balance ought to be weighed between doctor and
patient at the bedside. Over the past several decades, the courts, legislatures,
and society at large have coalesced in the view that a competent adult patient
has the right to consent, or to refuse to consent, to medical treatment, even if
her health caregivers vehemently disagree with her decision. By contrast,
society has not come to a consensus on whether patients should be entitled to
receive medical treatment, if, for example, the patient cannot pay for it, or if
the doctor thinks it is not medically appropriate, or if the insurance company
does not want to pay for it. The lack of societal consensus over when, if ever,
a patient should be entitled to receive health care is reflected by the absence
of clear legislation or judicial precedent recognizing such rights.

   A. The Right of Informed Consent

 Throughout most of the history of medicine, the doctor-patient relationship has
been founded on the ethics of beneficence, or paternalism.  n47 The doctor
decided what was best for the patient, and the patient accepted the decision,
usually without questioning, understanding, or perhaps even a real choice. The
doctor was guided in his decision by another related ethical principle, namely
non-maleficence, which required him to "above all, do no harm" to the patient.

    [*264]  These two principles of beneficence and non-maleficence formed the
ethical bedrock of the doctor-patient relationship until relatively recently.
n48 Paternalism in medicine was grounded in ethics, and it reflected a social
consensus, for most of history and still in many other countries, about what was
ethically appropriate behavior between doctors and patients. Doing the right
thing for the patient entailed doing what doctors thought was the best thing for
the patient: what would benefit her, and above all not harm her. The ethical
principle of autonomy, or respect for individual self-determination, played a
minor role in the doctor-patient relationship, and was reflected in the doctor's
obtaining the patient's consent before treatment.  n49 It did not matter that
the patient's expression of consent may have been pretty general, such as simply
"Yes," or "OK," or "Sure, doctor, whatever you say," or even the failure to say
"No." Ethics required at least a minimalist expression of autonomy, and law
backed ethics up. Since the early part of this century, the law has expressed
society's view that it was wrong - a violation of autonomy - to treat the
patient without some kind of consent. The law expressed this ethical view by
allowing the patient to sue her doctor for common-law battery if the doctor
treated her without prior consent.  n50

    [*265]  With the advent of the civil rights movement in the second half of
this century, Americans' views began to undergo substantial change concerning
the rights of individuals in relation to government and in relation to other
individuals or institutions who were more politically, socially, or economically
powerful. Not surprisingly, about this time, societal views concerning the
patient's role in the doctor-patient relationship also began to change.  n51
Patients began to voice the ethical proposition, founded on the autonomy
principle, that they, rather than the doctors, should have the ultimate
authority to decide the course of their medical treatment. Patients asserted
this ethical view, not by writing philosophy dissertations in universities or
passionate editorials in newspapers, but by taking their doctors to court.
Throughout the 1970s and 1980s in state courts and legislatures across the
country, patients began claiming that doctors had an ethical obligation, not
just to get them to agree to treatment, but to talk to them in more depth about
the nature and the risks of proposed medical treatment before providing it.  n52
In other words, they argued that doctors had an ethical duty to get more than
just bare consent; they ought to get the patient's informed consent prior to
treatment.

   Courts began to side with patients in this ethical debate by allowing
patients to sue a doctor, not just for battery, but also for medical malpractice
if the doctor failed to disclose, prior to treatment, certain significant
information about the proposed treatment which could affect the patient's
decision to accept or reject it. Starting from the ethical premise that patients
ought to be able to decide which treatments were in their best interest, courts
reasoned that patients needed to know a lot about a proposed  [*266]  treatment
before they could reasonably decide whether it was in their best interests to
have it. The courts therefore ruled that doctors were required to disclose
information which they knew about the treatment, and which patients would find
significant in deciding whether to accept it, such as the material risks
associated with it, its likelihood of success, its alternatives, and the
patient's prognosis without it.  n53 In some states, like Georgia, where the
courts did not reflect this ethical view in their common law, the state
legislatures enacted informed consent statutes which did so,  n54 and many
states have replaced their common-law developments with legislative enactments
on informed consent.  n55

   Informed consent doctrine thus reflects an ethical shift away from
professional paternalism (doing what in the doctor's view was in the patient's
best interest) and toward individual autonomy (letting the patient decide, once
fully informed, what was best). In effect, the widespread adoption of informed
consent laws reflects a societal consensus that in medical ethics at the
bedside, the principle of autonomy ought to prevail, in a case of conflict, over
the principle of beneficence. Patients were arguing that it was ethically
appropriate for doctors to talk in depth about the medical care they proposed,
even though such conversations were largely foreign to the ethical perspective
of the medical profession.  n56 Law was the vehicle by which the ethics of
patient self-determination and shared decision-making in the doctor-patient
[*267]  relationship were introduced to the medical profession.  n57 As a
profession, doctors may not have readily agreed that they had an ethical duty to
engage in these conversations with patients.  n58 Understandably, they have
resented both the lawsuits and the resulting laws. Those laws do reflect,
however, a societal consensus that it was ethically wrong not to engage in these
conversations with patients. Actions for battery and malpractice were simply the
ways that the law packed ethics with a punch.

   B. The Right to Refuse MedicalTreatment

 Issues in medical ethics at the bedside also arise when a patient wants to
refuse treatment that her doctors believe is in her best interests. A right to
refuse treatment would seem to be a natural corollary of the right to consent to
it. What now are the ethical responsibilities in the doctor-patient
relationship? In the name of autonomy, should, for example, a patient be allowed
to refuse CPR in the event of cardiac arrest, or to refuse a blood transfusion
in an emergency, or to forego other life-extending treatments, whether they be
ordinary or heroic measures? Or in the ethical interests of beneficence or
non-maleficence, should doctors be able to provide the treatment to save the
patient's life, even over her or her surrogate's objections?

   1. Incompetent Patients

 The first court case to address this question involved Karen Ann Quinlan, a
victim of a tragic accident that left her in a persistent vegetative state with
no possibility of recovery.  n59 After many  [*268]  years, Quinlan's father
finally asked to have his unconscious daughter disconnected from the ventilator,
in the belief that she would not have wished to have been kept alive by such
measures in a state of permanent unconsciousness. With the support of his
church, the father believed that it was morally right to stop providing this
form of treatment. The doctors, to the contrary, thought it was ethically wrong
to disconnect any living patient from a ventilator.  n60 What, ethically, should
be done? In a thoughtful opinion reflecting both ethical and legal precedent,
the court ruled in favor of the father's authority - rather than the doctors' -
to make the decisions about his daughter's medical treatment on her behalf in
light of what she would have wanted done under the circumstances.

   The case was controversial. Over the next three decades, state courts across
the country considered dozens of cases just like it. The courts have fairly
consistently upheld the ethical balance struck in Quinlan's case, and have ruled
that it is the patient's right (or a surrogate's right on the patient's behalf
if the patient is incompetent) to accept or to refuse medical treatment.  n61
Whether these court cases have changed social opinion, or whether changes in
social opinion are being reflected in these cases,  n62 gradually a social
consensus has emerged that patients (or their surrogates) - rather than doctors
- ought to decide ultimately how much and what kind of care they should have at
the end of life.

   When the United States Supreme Court in 1990 recognized under federal
Constitutional law that an individual has a liberty interest in refusing
unwanted medical treatment,  n63 the Court was  [*269]  reflecting this emerging
current societal consensus that individuals should have the "right to die with
dignity," and that it is wrong to extend life or prolong dying against the
patient's wishes. Over the past few decades, all state legislatures have also
backed up this ethical viewpoint with legislation recognizing the right of
patients to express their wishes, and to have them honored, through advance
directives like living wills or durable powers of attorney.  n64 Even the
federal government in 1991 addressed patients' rights with legislation pointedly
called the Patient Self-Determination Act,  n65 requiring hospitals to inform
patients about their rights under state law to consent to or refuse medical
treatment and to express their wishes in advance directives.

   2. Competent Patients

 The law has also been asked to resolve ethical conflicts at the bedside of
patients who are not terminally ill or comatose or in the process of dying. What
ought to happen when patients have, potentially, many years of healthy life
ahead of them if they are given certain medical treatment? Ethically, in the
interest of autonomy, should they be allowed to refuse it, when that decision
will likely result in declining health or even death? Or, in the interests of
beneficence and non-maleficence, should doctors be allowed to provide the care
to improve a patient's health or even save her life, over her objections?
Patients and doctors again took these ethical questions to the courts for
resolution. In deciding these cases, courts have expressly considered a variety
of ethical principles and concerns that compete with the ethical principle of
autonomy. In the courts' view, a person's interest in autonomy and control over
his body is not absolute, but must be carefully balanced against the ethical
interests of the community at large (the state) and of the medical profession in
particular.  n66

    [*270]  The state courts across the country have almost uniformly sided with
patients in this ethical debate. Courts have generally ruled that mentally
competent adults have the legal right to refuse any and all medical treatment,
even to the point of death. So, for example, a Jehovah's Witness may refuse a
life-saving blood transfusion,  n67 even if she is a parent whose refusal could
leave her children orphaned and without parental support.  n68 A person with
disabilities or serious illnesses, such as quadriplegia, may decline life-saving
medical treatment, nutrition, and hydration.  n69 Even state prison inmates may
refuse food and medical care to the point of death in some cases.  n70 Generally
speaking, however, courts have weighed this ethical balance against the patient
(and allowed doctors to provide treatment over the patient's objection) only
when the patient was a minor,  n71 or when the patient's refusal of medical
treatment might adversely affect the wellbeing of a minor  n72 or a fetus.  n73
Even in these  [*271]  cases, some courts have ruled that the patient may refuse
the treatment.  n74

   C. Patients' Rights and the Legal Power/Ethical PitfallProblem

 Do these legal developments in informed consent and refusal of medical
treatment reflect societal consensus? This essay argues that, at least in
theory, in giving primacy to the ethical principle of autonomy in the
doctor-patient relationship, the courts and legislatures have reflected, or
perhaps forged in some cases, a societal consensus that patients ought to have
more decision-making power in that relationship. By societal "consensus," again
it is not suggested that, as a practical matter, everyone in society agrees that
the ethically correct resolution has been reached in these cases.  n75 In
reality, plenty of people disagree. On ethical issues involving life and death,
there are bound to be sharp differences of opinions. While many patients, and
many who see themselves as future patients, may have come to believe that they
ought to be allowed to steer the course of the health care they receive, and
while the courts and legislatures may have agreed with them, the medical
profession has been slower to embrace the ethics of patient autonomy at the
bedside. So, for example, in the case of patients' rights to refuse medical
treatment, numerous studies and litigation have shown that despite court
rulings, living wills, durable powers of attorney, and so forth, many doctors
continue to provide treatment at the bedside without the consent or even over
the objections of patients or their families.  n76

    [*272]  Understandably, doctors resent the intrusion of law at the bedside.
Law came to the patients' bedside, however, because there was an emerging
societal sense that wrong was being done to the patients there. This invitation
to get the law involved in ethical conflicts is nothing new. Whenever there is a
social sense of wrong, or injustice, or an abuse of power by some people or some
institutions (including government), those who feel abused often turn to the law
for protection.  n77 In this case, a felt need for patient protection from a
power imbalance in the doctor-patient relationship has resulted in consent
forms, living wills, and other legal documents and rules. That these legal
mechanisms frequently provide only minimal protection in practice - that they
often fail to achieve the ethical balance that was their goal - does not alter
the point that their purpose was to promote an ethical vision of the
doctor-patient relationship.

   Although informed consent doctrine is founded on ethical ideals of respect
for persons, patient autonomy, and self-determination, as well as ideals of
shared decision-making and genuine collaboration between physician and patient,
actual practice in the relations between patients and providers is often
different. On the floor of so many hospitals and doctors' offices, informed
consent doctrine moves from the sublime to the ridiculous: from an active and
constructive conversation to a multi-page, incomprehensible consent document,
from facilitating a dialogue to  [*273]  getting a signature for the files. And
who is to blame? One may be tempted to say "the law," or at least "the lawyers."

   And to some extent that is true. After all, the law said it was important to
have these conversations, and backed that ethical proposition up with the punch
of liability for malpractice if the doctor or hospital did not have them.
Moreover, most legislation on informed consent provides explicit directions for
avoiding law's punch: get it in writing. Georgia's informed consent law, for
example, like many state statutes, provides that if one follows the instructions
and gets the patient's signature on a consent form that is filled out according
to statutory specifications, then the patient's consent will be legally presumed
to be valid.  n78 The bottom line: if you get the signature on a form like this
one, then you won't get sued ("punched").  n79

   And herein lies the pitfall which the very power of the law creates for
ethical reflection. That bottom line is near the bottom of ethical practice. As
argued earlier,  n80 law only sets a floor for ethical behavior. At the very
minimum, the law needs to be satisfied that the patient at least had the
opportunity to be informed about her diagnosis, the risks of treatment, her
alternatives, and so forth. The law does not require proof, beyond these
minimums, that the patient actually understood any of the information she was
given, or engaged in any genuine conversation with her health care providers
before accepting treatment, or made truly autonomous choices about her health
care. Faced with the power of law, however, we tend to get stuck in our ethical
reflections at the ground floor.  n81

   As is so often true when law packs ethics with a punch, people tend to
over-focus on avoiding the punch, and not on the  [*274]  ethical underpinnings
of the law. We get so obsessed about these forms that we forget that they were
designed to facilitate conversation, not to be a substitute for it. We forget
that they were intended to begin the conversations with patients, not to end
them. Forgetting the ethical ideals, we do not ask: did we have a real talk with
the patient, did the patient understand, does the patient really know and accept
what she is getting into? We worry only about legal compliance, and ask instead:
did you get the consent, by which we mean, did you get the signature? So often
before surgery one hears practitioners ask: "Did anybody go consent the
patient?" Now a transitive verb, "consent" is something that is done to the
patient, not something that the patient does.

   In reality, the law has done little to move actual medical practice closer to
the ideal of shared decision-making between physician and patient.  n82 Too
often, law has been used only to cover the doctor-patient relationship with
bureaucratic red tape.  n83 But it is not really the law's fault that ethical
ideals have not been achieved in medical practice. Health care providers are the
ones who can choose whether or not they want to go beyond  [*275]  law's
minimums and strive for the ethical maximums. They can choose to start and end
conversations with their patients with the informed consent form. Or they can
choose to go beyond the form and begin to engage the patient in thinking about
her health and the ways she thinks would best promote it, to allay her fears and
to give her confidence in her choices. Law never took it out of the hands of the
health care professionals to strive for the ethical high ground.

   D. The Right to Receive MedicalTreatment

 While social consensus has been evolving, at least in ethical and legal theory,
over patients' rights to consent to and refuse medical treatment, there is much
less social accord on more recently emerging ethical questions involving
patients' rights to receive medical treatment. We have never agreed in our
society that, ethically, every person who needs medical treatment ought to be
able to get it. Not surprisingly, we have no law that requires universal health
care coverage. Occasionally, we do agree that some people ought to be able to
get some kinds of medical treatment some of the time. For example, the federal
law mentioned earlier, which requires hospitals to treat emergency patients and
women in labor, reflects the social agreement that these patients ought to be
able to get emergency care regardless of their ability to pay for it.  n84 The
federal Medicaid and Medicare programs also reflect social accord that some
people should be able to get some treatment at least some of the time,
regardless of their ability to pay.

   Generally speaking, however, we have not yet found consensus on a range of
ethical questions involving when, if ever, patients ought to be entitled to
receive medical treatment that someone else either does not want to provide, or
does not want to pay for, or thinks that patients should not get. For example,
we have not yet agreed on whether a patient who is severely physically and
mentally disabled, such as permanently unconscious, ought to be able to get
medical treatment which her doctors do not want to provide because they say it
is futile, or her condition is too hopeless.  n85 We have not yet agreed on
whether patients  [*276]  with advanced breast cancer ought to be able to get
expensive high-tech treatment which their insurance companies do not want to pay
for because the insurance companies say it is experimental and unproven
treatment.  n86 And we are still deciding whether a patient ought to be able to
get a physician to help her commit suicide if she is terminally ill and wishes
to die.  n87

    [*277]  These ethical dilemmas may initially arise at the bedside, but their
ethical implications extend well beyond the doctor-patient relationship and
affect the broader community. That we are still in the process of finding a
social consensus on these questions is reflected, variously, by our lack of laws
directly addressing an issue, such as futile treatment;  n88 or by extensive
litigation resulting  [*278]  in conflicting court interpretations of existing
laws, such as with breast cancer treatment litigation;  n89 or by the passionate
calls that there "ought be a law," such as there is over the issue of
physician-assisted suicide, causing litigation going all the way to the Supreme
Court and heated debates in a multitude of state legislatures.  n90 To move in
the direction of patients' rights to  [*279]  receive treatment inevitably
entails a move beyond the bedside and into the offices and boardrooms of health
care providers and payers. Any claim that patients have a right to receive a
certain kind of medical care, or a certain quality of medical care, inevitably
raises the question, "Who's going to pay for it?" It is at this point that the
concerns of medical ethics begin to merge with those of business ethics, to
which this essay now turns.

   III. Ethics in the Boardroom: The Evolution of Organization Ethics and
Corporate HealthLaw

   A. Everybody Is a Patient Advocate TheseDays

 Although the medical profession may not have been among the vanguard of
patients' rights activists in the past, in the last few years it has
increasingly warmed to the role of patient advocate.  n91  [*280]  And the
medical profession is not alone. While it may have taken many individual patient
lawsuits and state-by-state legislative initiatives to establish patients'
rights to consent to and to refuse medical treatment over the past several
decades, in the past few years, many groups have come forward and made it their
priority to champion the rights of patients. "Patient protection acts" and
"patients' bills of rights" seem to have sprung up everywhere as people seem
keen to heed the rallying call of patients' rights. All of a sudden, everybody
is a patient advocate. In Congress, the AMA has been waging a "battle for strong
patient protection legislation that will support our right as physicians to
deliver medically appropriate care to our patients - and to support the rights
of our patients themselves."  n92 The American Hospital Association has revised
its own Patient Bill of Rights.  n93 The American Association of Health Plans
has added new patient protections to its initiative called, "Putting Patients
First."  n94 One of the biggest  [*281]  debates on Capitol Hill during the past
two years has been over competing Democratic and Republican proposals for a
patients' bill of rights.  n95 Why now is everyone clamoring to portray
themselves as friends of patients?

   Perhaps the patient has so many friends these days because, as the old saying
goes, "The enemy of my enemy is my friend." An editorial in a leading medical
journal began with dramatic war-like language: "The patient-physician
relationship is under siege."  n96 The AMA's patient protection campaigns and
the competing proposals for a patients' bill of rights are largely targeted at
perceived ethical abuses by managed care companies and payers of health care
services.  n97 Doctors and hospitals now see themselves, or at least portray
themselves, as aligned with patients as they struggle in the larger battle
against their common enemy - insurance companies, HMOs, and others who pay for
health care services.  n98

   As was earlier observed in the context of the doctor-patient relationship,
n99 the invitation to get the law involved in ethical conflicts is nothing new.
Whenever there is a social sense of wrong, injustice, or abuse of power, those
who feel harmed turn to the law for protection. Today, the clarion call for
patient protection legislation reflects a widespread societal concern about
potentially ethically abusive practices among those who pay for health care
services. Those who feel themselves hurt by such practices - the people who
provide those services as well as the patients who receive them - rally for new
laws, backed up by sanctions, to demonstrate societal intolerance of such
behaviors. The call for law is a call for society to lay down the ethical ground
rules, not just as before within the doctor-patient relationship, but now in the
whole health care industry.  n100

[*282]

   B. JCAHO's Accreditation Requirement for a Code of Organization Ethics: Law
Packs Ethics withaPunch

 In 1995, JCAHO saw clearly how the changing marketplace for health care was
placing new economic and ethical pressures on health care providers. At that
time, the Joint Commission created a new accreditation standard on organization
ethics. The new standard required a hospital to implement a "code of ethical
behavior" on the following activities: marketing; patient admission, transfer,
and discharge; billing practices; and the relationship of the organization and
its staff to other health care providers, educational institutions, and payers.
n101 In 1998, JCAHO added to this accreditation standard for an organization
ethics code the requirement that a hospital "protects the integrity of clinical
decision-making," regardless of its compensation or risk-sharing arrangements
with its leaders, managers, clinical staff, and licensed independent
practitioners.  n102

   What prompted JCAHO in the mid-1990s to get serious about business ethics in
health care organizations? After all, its accreditation standards already
addressed medical ethics and patients' rights.  n103 JCAHO was probably not just
jumping on the bandwagon of corporate mission statements and business ethics
codes.  n104 Rather, JCAHO was concerned that, in the ever increasingly
competitive health care environment, health care organizations might be tempted
to compromise on patient care. A spokesman for the Commission flatly stated that
the newly adopted 1995 accreditation requirements were "guided by the  [*283]
times, and the current environment in health care suggests a need for standards
that address conflict of interest statements and a code of ethical behavior. We
must assure that contractual ... agreements never compromise patient care."
n105 According to the Commission, the role of ethics in health care, whether
medical ethics or business ethics, is fundamentally to assure quality of patient
care: "The question to be considered is always, from an ethical standpoint, will
this business practice improve the quality of health care for patients. The
answer to that question ultimately will guide each decision."  n106

   What is interesting about the Commission's targeting these particular
activities in the new organization ethics code requirement - marketing, billing,
patient admissions and discharge, conflicts of interest, and compensation
arrangements - is that these same activities are also the current targets of the
most intense legal scrutiny in the history of health care law enforcement.
Because of rapid changes in health care markets, increased competition, and an
increased focus on constraining costs, redoubled efforts are being made to
ensure legal - as well as ethical - behavior by health care organizations. The
temptation for health care organizations to put profits ahead of patients is
causing a societal backlash that concerns not just the professional accreditors,
but law enforcers as well.

   As illustrated below, for each business practice which JCAHO briefly
identifies for inclusion in a hospital's organization ethics code, there is a
corresponding host of laws, regulations, and litigation addressing the same
conduct. JCAHO says simply: "The code ensures that the hospital conducts its
business practices and patient care practices in an honest, decent, and proper
manner."  n107 Increasingly called upon to define the thresholds of ethical
practice, the law packs this straightforward ethical ideal with a punch of
regulatory complexity and criminal and civil liability. The threat of that punch
- far more than the accreditation requirement for an ethics code - has fostered
a virtual industry of corporate compliance programs in health care organizations
today. After exploring how the law reinforces each of the organization ethics
standards of JCAHO through regulation and potential liability, this essay will
turn to the obvious question: Why didn't JCAHO simply say, "Obey the law"?

[*284]

   1. Billing Practices

 JCAHO briefly noted in its 1995 accreditation manual: "To support ethical
operations, an organization must have in place a mechanism to ensure that
patients are billed for only those services and care provided."  n108 A simple,
clear, straightforward ethical proposition: bill only for the services you
actually perform or the care you actually provide. Alleged violations of this
ethical proposition have created a virtual firestorm of investigations and
litigation throughout the health care industry. Industry concern over the
government's crackdown on fraud and abuse topped the Top 10 List of health law
developments for 1998 and ranked second for 1999.  n109 Health care fraud
enforcement has become a top priority at the Department of Justice, which
recovered $ 1.2 billion from its enforcement activities in 1997.  n110

   JCAHO's ethical standard to ensure proper billing has been dwarfed by a
legion of law enforcement activities addressing hospital billing practices. In
the past few years, the federal government has pursued alleged hospital fraud,
much of it in the billing area, through at least six major enforcement
intiatives:  n111 LabScam,  n112 the 72-Hour Window Project,  n113 the Lab
Unbundling  [*285]  Project,  n114 the Physicians at Teaching Hospitals (PATH)
initiative,  n115 the diagnosis-related grouping upcoding project,  n116 and the
transfer/discharge project.  n117 As if these government-initiated
investigations into alleged health care billing fraud were not enough, hospitals
also face the prospect of multi-million dollar litigation in qui tam lawsuits
initiated by private persons, or whistleblowers (frequently disgruntled former
employees), under the False Claims Act.  n118 To prevent false billing, or at
least to forestall prosecution and litigation for alleged false billing, health
care providers are hiring attorneys, accountants, and consultants to create
corporate compliance programs in record numbers.  n119

[*286]

   2. Marketing and Advertising

 JCAHO's new accreditation standard also addressed marketing practices: "To
support ethical operations, an organization must have in place a mechanism to
ensure that ... marketing ... practices are conducted in an ethical manner."
n120 JCAHO "recommends that the hospital adopt a statement of marketing and
public relations practices that addresses issues of truth, accuracy, fairness,
and responsibility to patients, community and the larger public."  n121 These
are good, solid, ethical principles: truth, honesty, fairness. Prior to 1995,
the law had already reflected these principles with legislation and regulations
governing truth in advertising. The Federal Trade Commission (FTC) has long had
authority to investigate and enjoin false or misleading advertising under
federal law which prohibits unfair acts and practices and unfair methods of
competition.  n122 So, for example, the FTC has challenged as false, deceptive,
or misleading the advertising claims of health care providers involving diet and
weight loss programs,  n123 success rates for infertility services  n124 and
cancer treatments,  n125 liposuction surgery,  n126 surgery for bowel-related
diseases,  n127 and even the efficacy of Prozac as a cure for obesity.  n128
[*287]  One hospital chain has been challenged twice by the FTC for misleading
advertising of ileostomy and in vitro fertilization services through its
specialized clinics.  n129 JCAHO's new standard to ensure ethical marketing
practices seems to address the same concerns as are already addressed by federal
and state consumer protection laws.

   3. Patient Admission, Transfer, and Discharge

 JCAHO's new accreditation standard also meant that: "To support ethical
operations, an organization must have in place a mechanism to ensure that ...
admission, transfer, and discharge practices are conducted in an ethical
manner."  n130 In 1995, JCAHO said it wanted to ensure that: "Admissions and
transfer policies are not based on patient or organization economics. Only
patients whose specific condition or disease cannot be safely treated at the
organization are diverted, refused admission, or transferred to another
organization."  n131 Not coincidentally, this ethical concern is soundly backed
up by numerous laws to ensure that, due to financial pressures or incentives,
hospitals do not prematurely discharge a patient before he or she is medically
stable;  n132 that private hospitals do not engage in "patient dumping" of
uninsured patients onto public hospitals;  n133 or that health care
organizations do not engage in other discriminatory  [*288]  refusals of
treatment based on economics or prejudice, such as fear of AIDS.  n134

   4. Compensation Arrangements and Risk-Sharing

 In 1998, JCAHO added to its accreditation standard for an organization ethics
code a requirement that the hospital "protects the integrity of clinical
decision-making" regardless of its compensation or risk-sharing financial
arrangements with its administrators or clinicians. This new requirement is
doubtless responsive to emerging ethical concerns about health care providers
who may have financial pressures or incentives to deny or limit patient care.
One of these concerns is that both individual and institutional providers may
feel pressured to cut their costs by "under-utilizing" medical resources,
specifically by failing to provide necessary medical care.  n135 Managed-care
programs in  [*289]  particular have been the subject of considerable commentary
on this score.  n136 Whether or not these financial considerations have actually
resulted in limitations or denials of medically necessary care by providers or
insurers is still hotly debated.  n137 Widespread  [*290]  societal concern that
they have, however, is reflected in the tremendous amount of recent litigation
by patients alleging that they have been improperly denied such care by their
health plans, doctors, and hospitals based on claims under federal law as well
as under traditional state law theories such as malpractice, corporate
negligence, fraud, breach of fiduciary duty, and other traditional state law
claims.  n138 Indeed, the most strenuously contested  [*291]  issue in the whole
controversy these past two years over proposals for a patients' bill of rights
has been whether patients ought to be allowed to sue their health care providers
and payers for improper - and potentially unethical - denial of benefits under
these traditional state law theories of liability.  n139 The JCAHO standard thus
identifies an ethical principle, whose potential breach has already been the
target of considerable legal attention in recent years.

   5. Conflicts of Interest

 In 1995, the JCAHO organization ethics standard as originally implemented was
addressed to the somewhat more "garden variety" of conflicts of interests that
may arise in contracts  [*292]  between a health care organization and its
suppliers.  n140 This sort of conflict of interest, potentially involving
self-dealing by the members of a corporate governing board, is standard fare for
legal sanction in state corporations laws.  n141 The federal anti-kickback laws
n142 are also designed to prevent ethical abuses caused by self-interested
transactions. In particular, the federal Office of the Inspector General has
published numerous Special Fraud Alerts dealing with potential violations of the
anti-kickback laws  [*293]  in the health care field, and involving potential
conflicts of interest which can compromise the quality of patient care.  n143

   C. Why Didn't JCAHO Simply Say, "ObeytheLaw"?

 The question naturally arises, why did JCAHO decide to require hospitals to
adopt a code of organization ethics when there were already numerous federal and
state laws on the books addressed to the very same subjects? Why not just tell
the hospitals, "Obey the law"? Why would JCAHO require a code of organization
ethics that seems to duplicate everything the law already requires health care
organizations to do? Was it just window-dressing? Perhaps, but there are a
couple of less cynical possibilities.

   1. Professional Self-Policing

 One possibility is that the Commission is only doing what is required of all
sectors of society that want to be called "professions": they insist on
self-regulation and self-policing. That is one of the key distinguishing
features between a business and a profession. A profession engages in
self-regulation.  n144 The law enforcers cannot catch everyone; a lot of
misconduct falls between the cracks.  n145 Perhaps JCAHO recognized that a
profession  [*294]  worthy of the name will take it upon itself to uncover and
correct wrong-doing. JCAHO understandably takes the position that the primary
purpose of health care organizations is to provide patients with appropriate,
high-quality health care.  n146 Beyond legal compliance, ethical conduct by
health care providers ultimately promotes the quality of care delivered to
patients.  n147

   2. Going Beyond the Law

 Another, related possibility is that JCAHO is deliberately reflecting a key
distinction between law and ethics, in the sense of recognizing that ethics is
aspirational, and covers a lot of conduct not necessarily prohibited by law. Law
may set the floors below which behavior may not sink without incurring societal
sanction, but ethics creates the ceilings that good people aspire to reach.
JCAHO's inclusion of marketing practices in the code of ethics is a good example
here. The law's attention to ethical marketing practices focuses on setting
ground rules: is the advertising truthful - not false, deceptive, or misleading?
If yes, then it is legal. Ethics' attention to marketing practices goes further
and might ask, is the advertising responsible and socially appropriate?  [*295]
Does it, for example, encourage unhealthy practices, such as was alleged in the
marketing of breast milk substitutes in Third World countries? Does health care
advertising create, rather than simply channel, demand for health care services?
Does it reflect negative social stereotyping?  n148 On each of the issues
required to be included in a hospital's organization ethics code, JCAHO has
implicitly challenged hospitals to go beyond the legal minimums.

   Through the new accreditation standard on organization ethics, JCAHO hopes to
instill ethical sensitivity throughout the institution, rather than allow ethics
to be seen as the purview of the few members of the ethics committee. As a JCAHO
spokesperson said, "Ethical behavior ideally will become a daily interest of
management and staff."  n149 But will people really care about ethical ideals
when the federal agents are knocking at the door, or the accountants and lawyers
keep interrupting with new and improved corporate compliance programs? Once they
all leave, is it "OK everybody, back to work"?

   D. Corporate Compliance Programs: Example of the Legal Power/Ethical
PitfallProblem

 Unfortunately, corporate compliance programs may be doing to organization
ethics what informed consent forms did to  [*296]  medical ethics: They distract
us from thinking about ethics. We can get so focused on complying with "the
letter of the law" that we are too tired or busy or frustrated to wonder about
adhering to its ethical "spirit." We understandably become satisfied that
compliance with the legal minimums was all that ethics required us to do.

   Here again, the very power of the law creates pitfalls for ethical
reflection. We open up the daily and weekly health care newspapers and journals,
and what do we see? We see evidence of the law's punch everywhere. We see the
reports on who is being investigated, who is being indicted, who is going to
jail, who paid how many millions of dollars in fines to settle the
investigations, who paid how many millions more when the investigators would not
settle and demanded fines and prison terms, and so forth.  n150 Is it any wonder
that ethical ideals get lost in the legal shuffle?

   Even if it is understandable that our obsession with law distracts us from
ethical reflection, that distraction is not necessary or even necessarily
excusable. Neither the law nor the devil makes us do it. The law does not make
us forget our ethical moorings; we just allow ourselves to get side-tracked.
Strong corporate compliance programs under the law do not have to supplant even
stronger ethical direction by management.  n151 The law in this area even often
reminds us that its purpose is about ethics.  [*297]  The settlement agreements
between the government and health care organizations in health care fraud cases,
for example, are often called "corporate integrity agreements" which set up
"corporate integrity programs" within the settling health care organization.
These formal agreements may acknowledge at the very outset that the settling
organization "has expressed an interest in demonstrating, notwithstanding [its
alleged misconduct, that it] can be trusted to deal fairly and honestly with the
Government ... [and that it possesses] the high degree of business integrity
required of a provider participating in federally-funded health care programs."
n152

   But those are just the legal forms, and the forms themselves so often blind
us to the ethical substance behind them. The ethical objectives become buried
under the pages and pages of forms, the mountains and mountains of documents:
the subpoenas, the filings, the records, the interrogatories, the financial
statements, the releases, the contracts, the disclaimers, the memorandums, the
charts, the codes, the questionnaires, the reports, and the compliance plans
themselves.  n153 The paper trail seems to lead us into ethical darkness. Who
can help but laugh and think JCAHO was just spitting in the wind back in the
mid-1990s when it said about its new accreditation standard for an organization
code of ethics that: "In some real way this code of ethics has to be more than
just nice words on a piece of paper"?  n154

   And yet JCAHO was right for the very reason that everyone is now drowning in
paper. This avalanche of paper is in no small  [*298]  part a result of the fact
that too often, too many people in health care were not paying attention to the
basic ethical question, "What would be the right thing to do under these
circumstances?" In the administrative offices and boardrooms of health care
organizations, too many people simply did not ask whether their billing
practices accurately reflected their health care services. If some even noticed
that board members, administrators, or clinicians were engaging in
self-interested transactions with contractors or suppliers, they looked the
other way. Through aggressive prosecutions and defensive corporate compliance
programs designed to forestall prosecutions, the law now forces examination of
the basic ethical question in a variety of contexts: billing, advertising,
patient care, conflicts of interest, and compensation arrangements. It is
nonetheless ironic that the law's very power in focusing attention on ethical
issues can so easily create the pitfall of accepting law's minimum requirements
as ethical maximums. As earlier observed, the law itself has never taken it out
of the hands of the health care professionals to strive for the ethical high
ground.

   IV. Ethics in Health Care: An AlternativetoLaw

 It is easy to be cynical about law and ethics and to believe that, inverting
the old saying, in law "it's not the principle, it's the money." Unfortunately,
it is just as easy to be cynical and say the same thing about medicine and
ethics, or about business and ethics. It is possible, for example, to transform
the medical ethics concerns about the provision of futile medical treatment or
physician-assisted suicide into financial concerns about saving money rather
than saving lives. Certainly cynics can (and do) argue that many of the recent
calls for patients' bills of rights have less to do with protecting patients
than with protecting doctors, employers, or even the managed care companies
themselves.  n155 Newspapers report as front-page news the views of  [*299]
those who say that all the recent patient protection initiatives are really not
about patients, but about "protecting the incomes, jobs and turf of the health
care system's biggest and richest vested interests."  n156

   Unless we are prepared to say that money turns all of the phrases - "legal
ethics," or "business ethics," or "medical ethics" - into oxymorons, we should
acknowledge that professional conduct and business conduct ought to be
consistent with ethical conduct.  n157 The question then becomes, "Who is going
to ensure ethical conduct in health care?" The lawyers or the accountants?  n158
Compliance officers?  n159 The patients?  n160 The hospital chaplain? An
institutional ethics committee?

   This last candidate has increasingly been saddled with this responsibility in
recent years. Having previously gotten organized to address the ethical issues
involving patient care, these  [*300]  hospital committees are now often asked
to adopt and implement the organization ethics code as well.  n161 It seems a
lot to ask one committee - and usually a volunteer committee at that - to take
the brunt of ensuring the ethical integrity of an entire institution. Ethics
committees already have far too much on their plate. It is humanly impossible
for members of an ethics committee to be able to understand, let alone absorb
and process, all of the ethical dilemmas faced both at the bedside and in the
boardrooms of health care organizations.  n162

   In any event, should ethics be handled by committee in the first place?
Admittedly, the law had a hand in promoting ethics committees a few decades ago.
n163 Before the law's intervention,  [*301]  there generally were no
institutional forums for raising, let alone formally addressing, ethical
questions in health care organizations. Should health care providers continue to
rely so heavily on ethics by committee today? Like law, the very existence of an
ethics committee poses a pitfall for ethical reflection in the institution.
Whenever any committee is charged with a task, one problem is the tendency of
everybody else in the organization to refer that task to that committee.
Everyone can say, "Hey, that's their job, that's not my job."  n164

   The point is, ethics is everybody's job.  n165 Institutional ethics
committees can certainly help everybody do their job. The committees can
educate; they can set policy; they can even consult on cases from time to time.
n166 It is the responsibility of the highest management in the institution,
however, to instill in everybody a sense that ethics is their individual
priority. Perhaps the best alternative to having the law take the lead in
promoting ethical conduct in a health care institution is for the members of its
[*302]  highest management to shoulder that responsibility - visibly, credibly,
and passionately.  n167

   Ethics in health care inevitably means asking how conduct will affect the
quality of care of patients.  n168 Those who serve in the highest levels of a
health care organization have the greatest opportunity - and responsibility -
for ensuring its ethical integrity. Like the law, management has the power to
pack ethics with a punch. It only needs the will to do so. The highest levels of
administration have the power - and the duty - to set the ethical tone of an
organization, to demonstrate their ethical commitment throughout every
department of the institution, and to provide ongoing oversight and sanctions,
if necessary. Ethics committees can greatly support management and can even take
the lead in charting an institution's responses to ethical dilemmas as they
arise. But ethics committees, like ethics in general, serve primarily an
aspirational role. They often lack the power within the institution to make
ethics happen. The highest administrative levels in the organization do have
this power, and they have the duty to exercise it responsibly.

    [*303]  Management must both ask the hard questions, and make sure that they
get answered.  n169 If it does not, then eventually society will - through law.
This essay has traced the history of law's influence on the ethical evolution of
health care providers. It has illustrated how, whether health care professionals
liked it or not, the law has had to address difficult questions in medical
ethics and how it is currently addressing serious questions in business ethics.
Many people do not like the ways that the law (through courts, legislatures, or
enforcement agencies) handles these hard questions. Many people vehemently
disagree with the law's resolution of ethical dilemmas, or detest the power of
law to coerce societal views of ethical behavior. Until those within the health
care profession and industry assume leadership and take responsibility to define
and debate the ethical questions and continually refine the ethical answers - in
other words, to go beyond the law and to do the right thing  n170 - history is
probably bound to repeat itself. And then the law's presence will loom even
larger in the ethical life of health care organizations.


Legal Topics:

For related research and practice materials, see the following legal topics:
Copyright LawOwnership InterestsGeneral OverviewHealthcare
LawInsuranceReimbursementGeneral OverviewPublic Health & Welfare
LawHealthcareGeneral Overview

FOOTNOTES:




n1.  On ethics' inquiry into right and wrong, see Deborah Caswell & H. Gill
Cryer, Nursing Grand Rounds: Case Study: When the Nurse and Physician Don't
Agree, 9 J. Cardiovascular Nurs. 30, 37 (1995) ("Traditionally, ethics has been
defined as the inquiry into rules and principles of morality, of right and wrong
conduct, of virtue and vice, and of good and evil as they relate to conduct.");
Bethany Spielman, Invoking the Law in Ethics Consultation, 2 Cambridge Q.
Healthcare Ethics 457, 464 (1993) (stating that ethics is "an attempt to answer
the question: what, all things considered, ought to be done in a given
situation?"). On law's inquiry, see Roger B. Dworkin, Limits: The Role of Law in
Bioethical Decision Making 6-7 (1996):



   Paul Freund put it best: "The law is dialectic in a deeper sense than its
adversary process. It mediates most significantly between right and right."...
The only questions that matter for the law are those in which there is something
"right," or good, on both or all sides of the controversy... When right exists
on both sides of an issue, the job of the law is to mediate between the
"rights," to accommodate, to adjust, to attempt to sacrifice as little as
possible of what is "right" on both sides.




n2.  Immanuel Kant, Idea for a Universal History with a Cosmopolitan Purpose,
Fifth Proposition, in Kant: Political Writings 45 (Hans Reiss ed. & H. B. Nisbet
trans., 1991).




n3.  Oliver Wendell Holmes, The Path of the Law, 10 Harv. L. Rev. 457 (1897).
See also Daniel Callahan, Escaping from Legalism: Is It Possible?, Hastings
Center Rep., Nov.-Dec. 1996, at 34 ("No myth is so hardy as the notion that 'you
can't legislate morality,' which of course we do all the time.").




n4.  As used in this essay, the word "consensus" does not imply unanimity or
complete agreement on a proposition, but rather a sense of general agreement. In
a democratic society, consensus among people may be represented by a bare
majority, as shown by those who represent the people and are elected to reflect
the people's views (as is true for majority passage of a piece of legislation),
or by a supermajority, as is required for the passage of constitutional
amendments. Consensus may be reflected in court decisions as well, whether there
may be one or two controversial court decisions, or a trend among many court
decisions, at the federal or state level which are not overturned by a
legislature, and may in fact be supported by subsequent legislation. See infra
note 36 and accompanying text. Law frequently serves as society's forum for
airing and resolving ethical debate. See infra notes 41-43 and accompanying
text. Legislatures and courts may sometimes be responding reactively to changing
societal views on what is ethically appropriate behavior. They may sometimes be
creating proactively these changes in social opinion. Whether proactive or
reactive, the laws that endure reflect our society's views about ethical
behavior in health care.




n5.  Maxwell J. Mehlman, Rationing Expensive Lifesaving Medical Treatments, 1985
Wis. L. Rev. 239, 256 (criticized for preferring Sunday school teachers and
scout leaders, the "Seattle God Committee" had policies that "ruled out creative
nonconformists who rub the bourgeoisie the wrong way... The Pacific Northwest is
no place for a Henry David Thoreau with bad kidneys."); id. at 256 (quoting
Sanders & Dukeminier, Medical Advance and Legal Lag: Hemodialysis and Kidney
Transplantation, 15 UCLA L. Rev. 357, 377 (1968)).




n6.  See id. at 247-48. See also 42 U.S.C. 426-1 (1991) (concerning end-stage
renal disease program).




n7.  See generally James Jones, Bad Blood: The Tuskegee Syphilis Experiment
(1992) [hereinafter Jones, Bad Blood]; Ad Hoc Advisory Panel, Final Report of
the Tuskegee Syphilis Study, U.S. Dept. of Health, Education, and Welfare,
Public Health Service (1975).




n8.  See Jones, Bad Blood, supra note 7, at 94 ("Such a study would be an
expression of concern for Negro health problems, keeping the PHS involved as a
vital force in promoting medical attention to blacks[,] and that Macon County
presented a 'ready-made situation ... for carrying on the proposed study' of
untreated syphilis in Negroes."). See also infra note 18 and accompanying text.




n9.  See generally 2 Barry R. Furrow et al., Health Law 23-1 (1995). In 1974,
the National Research Act established the National Commission for the Protection
of Human Subjects of Biomedical and Behavioral Research to "conduct a
comprehensive investigation and study to identify basic ethical principles" for
the conduct of human subjects research. Id. at 549.




n10.  See 45 C.F.R. 84.55 (1985). Subsections (b) through (e) were later
invalidated by the Supreme Court in Bowen v. American Hospital Association, 476
U.S. 610 (1986).




n11.  See Alexander Morgan Capron, Baby Ryan and Virtual Futility, Hastings
Center Rep., Mar.-Apr. 1995, at 20-21.




n12.  See 45 C.F.R. 84.55(b)(3) (1985) (stating that hospitals were required to
post notices that declared: "It is the policy of this hospital, consistent with
Federal law, that, nourishment and medically beneficial treatment ... should not
be withheld from handicapped infants solely on the basis of their present or
anticipated mental or physical impairments."). See also Sarah Glazer, Born Too
Soon, Too Small, Too Sick: Whatever Happened to Baby Doe?, Washington Post, Apr.
2, 1991, at Z8.




n13.  See Bowen v. American Hosp. Ass'n, 476 U.S. 610 (1986).




n14.  See Capron, supra note 11, at 21; Glazer, supra note 12. While the first
Baby Doe regulations treated nontreatment of critically ill infants by
health-care providers as a potential violation of federal discrimination laws,
the Child Abuse and Neglect Amendments of 1984 (42 U.S.C. 5101-03) shifted the
focus to parental decision-making under state law, requiring reports to state
child welfare agencies only when medical treatment decisions might be viewed
under state law as child neglect. See Mary Crossley, Infants With Anencephaly,
the ADA, and the Child Abuse Amendments, 11 Issues L. & Med. 379, 407-08 (1996):



   The Amendments effectively define when parental decisions regarding
nontreatment for infants with disabilities threaten such serious harm that state
authorities should review those decisions... A parental choice falling below
this floor is suspect, and the Amendments accordingly require reporting of the
case to state authorities so that the state can determine whether there exists a
need to intervene to prevent or remedy medical neglect. Medical choices not
falling below this floor are left to unfettered parental discretion.




n15.  For a good account of the state of the law prior to EMTALA, see generally
Karen H. Rothenberg, Who Cares? The Evolution of the Legal Duty to Provide
Emergency Care, 26 Hous. L. Rev. 21 (1989).




n16.  42 U.S.C. 1395dd (1992). See generally Lynn Healy Scaduto, Comment, The
Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act Gone Astray: A Proposal to
Reclaim EMTALA for Its Intended Beneficiaries, 46 UCLA L. Rev. 943, 948 (1999)
(stating that the legislative intent "behind EMTALA was to deter what Congress
perceived to be the burgeoning practice among hospital emergency rooms of
dumping indigent and uninsured patients"). See infra notes 19, 84-90 and
accompanying text (discussing divergent legal and ethical views over providing a
right to receive medical treatment in America).




n17.  See Guido Calabresi & Philip Bobbitt, Tragic Choices 186-89 (1978)
(describing the Seattle God Committee's attempt to allocate kidneys in a
socially responsible way).




n18.  See supra note 8. See also Tom Junod, Deadly Medicine, GQ, June 1993, at
164, 170 (relating that one of the study's defenders, Dr. Sidney Orlansky, later
reflected on subsequent objections to the study: "After seeing these people,
knowing them and studying them and the record, I honestly feel that we have done
them no real harm and probably have helped them in many ways." At a 1969 meeting
at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in Atlanta to discuss whether
the study should continue, Dr. Orlansky continued to insist that Tuskegee was "a
good study[,]" and "that there were no medical grounds for treating the men,
that for the most part their syphilis was inactive and that giving them
penicillin could incur 'catastrophic consequences.'"). For a good narrative
presentation of the ethical dilemmas posed for those who participated in the
Tuskegee study, such as the white doctors and the black nurse who worked with
the male subjects of the study, see David Feldshuh, Miss Evers' Boys, American
Theatre, Nov. 1990, a play which was made into a TV movie by Home Box Office in
1997.




n19.  The ethical position of the hospitals is similar to that of doctors today,
who are under no legal obligation to provide free medical care to patients who
cannot pay for these services and who, according to a recent study, are
providing less and less free care in health markets where managed care is
prevalent. See Peter J. Cunningham et al., Managed Care and Physicians'
Provision of Charity Care, 281 JAMA 1087, 1087-92 (1999). The hospitals'
"dumping" practice found legal support (just as today, doctors' decisions not to
provide charity care continues to find support) in the "no duty to rescue"
doctrine of the law, which in turn is premised on the ethical view that one is
not morally obligated to go out of one's way to help a stranger. See W. Page
Keeton et al., Prosser and Keeton on the Law of Torts 56 (5th ed. 1984)
[hereinafter Keeton, Law of Torts]. This ethical debate goes back to scripture,
with the moral quandary of whether we are our brother's keeper. See Gen. 4:9
("Then the Lord said to Cain, 'Where is your brother Abel?' 'I don't know,' he
replied. 'Am I my brother's keeper?'"). See also infra notes 39-40 and
accompanying text. While Prosser thought that the law has struck an
inappropriate ethical balance in this doctrine, society has not generally agreed
with him, by virtue of the doctrine's continuing without overruling by courts or
legislation except in certain cases involving special relationships, see Keeton,
Law of Torts, 375-77, or in specific legislation like EMTALA addressing specific
situations like emergency room patients. For example, the view that there is no
general moral obligation to provide goods or services to people who cannot pay
for them is currently reflected in America's unwillingness to enact universal
health care coverage, although federal coverage has been enacted for targeted
populations, such as certain poor families through Medicaid, or the elderly or
disabled through Medicare. Reflecting perhaps basic ethical ambivalence in our
society over granting patients a right to receive health care, see infra notes
84-90 and accompanying text, government enforcement of EMTALA has allegedly been
inadequate. See Lauren A. Dame, The Emergency Treatment and Active Labor Act:
The Anomalous Right to Health Care, 8 Health Matrix 3, 11-21 (1998). There
continues to be lively academic debate over whether a right to emergency
hospital treatment regardless of ability to pay for it is "a good or a bad
thing." Id. at 4, 28 ("the purpose of EMTALA, to protect patients at a time of
scary and perhaps desperate medical need, is noble and reflects the finer
aspects of our medical system"); cf. David A. Hyman, Patient Dumping and EMTALA:
Past Imperfect/Future Shock, 8 Health Matrix 29 (1998) (arguing that "the
premise of the statute is silly at best"); id. at 54-55 (suggesting that EMTALA
is a "symbolic law" resulting from "anecdotal advocacy" rather than hard data,
and comparing it to "other ineptly drafted, tunnel-visioned, short-sighted, and
counterproductive laws").




n20.  See Judith Graham, Weighing Care for "Preemies", Chicago Trib., Jan. 10,
1999, at 5 (noting that treatment decisions for extremely premature infants
continue to be highly controversial).




n21.  See infra note 36 and accompanying text.




n22.  See infra notes 46-90 and accompanying text (discussing medical ethics at
the patient's bedside).




n23.  See infra notes 91-154 and accompanying text (discussing business ethics
in the boardrooms of health-care organizations). Many of these issues are
addressed in recent proposals for new federal legislation addressing managed
care reform, often referred to as "patient protection" legislation or a
"patients' bill of rights." These proposals have been the subject of contentious
Congressional debate during 1998 and 1999. See generally Mary Agnes Carey,
Patients' Rights May Die Aborning, CQ Weekly, Aug. 1, 1998, at 2074-82. Efforts
to pass a federal patients' bill of rights during 1998 became deadlocked by
October. See Senate Defeats Final Democratic Effort to Force Debate on Managed
Care Bills, 7 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1642 (Oct. 5, 1998). In early 1999, competing
Democratic and Republican bills were re-introduced, and they illustrate how
politically divisive the debate over patients' rights is, with the sides in the
debate largely following party lines. See Geri Aston, Patient Protections Follow
Party Lines, Am. Med. News, Apr. 5, 1999, at 5. In October 1999, the House
managed to pass a bipartisan bill which provided broader patient protections
than did a Senate bill which was passed in July 1999. See Geri Aston, 'A Big Win
for Patients', Am. Med. News, Oct. 25, 1999, at 1 [hereinafter Aston, A Big
Win]. As of this writing, it is predicted that negotiations for compromise
legislation between the House and Senate will be difficult. See Jonathan
Gardner, House Vote Sets the Stage: Conference Panel Must Iron Out Differences
On Patient Protection, Modern Healthcare (Oct. 11, 1999); Norwood-Dingell
Managed Care Bill Sails Through House in Massive Bipartisan Vote, 8 Health L.
Rep. (BNA) 1654 (Oct. 14, 1999). See also Wendy K. Mariner, Going Hollywood with
Patient Rights in Managed Care, 281 JAMA 861 (1999) (distinguishing "consumer
rights" from "patient rights" as the focus of recent managed care reform
proposals).




n24.  In August 1998, the federal Office of Personnel Management issued a final
rule, 63 Fed. Reg. 42584 (1998), banning "gag clauses" from contracts with
insurers which participate in the federal employees' health benefits program.
See OPM Issues Final Rule on Gag Clauses in Federal Employees Health Coverage, 7
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1297 (Aug. 13, 1998) (stating that contracts may not
provide any direct or indirect incentives to restrict what providers may discuss
with patients about treatment options; rule is designed to bring federal
programs into compliance with proposals for federal "patients' bill of rights").
Federal managed care reform proposals would also ban gag clauses. See Comparison
of Major Provisions of Democratic, Republican Patients' Bill of Rights
Legislation, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1145 (July 15, 1999). Currently, 47 states
prohibit any gag clauses which limit a physician's ability to discuss treatment
options with patients. See NCSL State-By-State Report Details Wide Range of
Consumer Protection Laws, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1282 (Aug. 5, 1999)
[hereinafter State-By-State Report]. Similarly, Georgia's Patient Protection Act
of 1996 also provides that no health care provider may be penalized for
discussing medically necessary or appropriate care with a patient. See Ga. Code
Ann. 33-20A-7 (1997). See generally Jennifer L. Myron, HMOs' Use of Gag Clauses:
An Unethical Threat to America's Health, 101 Dick. L. Rev. 729 (1997).




n25.  See the federal Newborns' and Mothers' Health Protection Act of 1996, 29
U.S.C.A. 1185 (1999), for which implementing federal regulations are expected.
See also HIPAA: Maternity Stay Rule Released; Spells Out When Coverage Starts, 7
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1715 (Oct. 29, 1998) (noting that federal law requires
group health plans with maternity benefits to allow 48-hour hospital stays after
normal vaginal births and 96-hour hospital stays for cesarean section
deliveries). See also Georgia's Newborn Baby and Mother Protection Act, Ga. Code
Ann. 33-24-58 (1996) (stating similar provisions).




n26.  19 states have passed legislation requiring minimum lengths of time for
hospital stays following a mastectomy. See State-By-State Report, supra note 24.
The Senate version of proposed patient protection legislation which passed in
July 1999 would ban "drive-through" mastectomies and would require health plans
to pay for hospital stays for whatever length of time deemed appropriate by the
patient and her physician. See Senate Appoints Managed Care Conferees; GOP
Leadership Urged to Respect House Vote, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1688 (Oct. 21,
1999) [hereinafter Senate Appoints].




n27.  Concern over financially-motivated denials of care is one of the most
contentious issues surrounding managed care. See infra notes 135-39 and
accompanying text. See generally Henry T. Greely, Direct Financial Incentives in
Managed Care: Unanswered Questions, 6 Health Matrix 53 (1996); David
Orentlicher, Paying Physicians More to Do Less: Financial Incentives to Limit
Care, 30 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (1996). For a controversial recent case involving
this issue, see Herdrich v. Pegram, 154 F.3d 362, 380 (7th Cir. 1998) (holding
that complaint was sufficient to state a claim for breach of fiduciary duty
under ERISA where plaintiff alleged that defendants' incentive system depleted
health plan resources so as to benefit physicians who administered the plan,
possibly to the detriment of patients), cert. granted, 120 S.Ct. 10 (1999); see
also Shea v. Esensten, 107 F.3d 627 (8th Cir. 1997) (allowing breach of
fiduciary duty claim under ERISA for failure to disclose financial incentives).
The potential for financial incentives to result in medically inappropriate
denials or limitations of care is addressed in some states' recent managed care
legislation, such as Georgia's Patient Protection Act of 1996 which prohibits a
managed care plan from using a financial incentive program that directly
compensates a health provider for ordering or providing less than medically
necessary and appropriate care to his or her patients. See Ga. Code Ann.
33-20A-6 (1996). See generally Lead Report, Physician Incentive Plans: States
Tell Health Plans that Incentives May Not Limit Medically Necessary Care, 7
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1581 (Oct. 8, 1998) (stating that 21 states currently
prohibit managed care plans from using financial incentives to induce phsyicians
to restrict medically necessary services).




n28.  Getting insurers to approve doctors' medical treatment recommendations for
their patients has been one of the "most frustrating and infuriating features"
of dealing with managed care, and recently one major HMO announced it would no
longer require such prior approvals - a move popularly viewed as returning
decision-making power over patient care to the physicians. See Jennifer
Steinhauer & Milt Freudenheim, H.M.O.'s Shift May Please Patients, but Raise
Costs, N.Y. Times, Nov. 10, 1999, at C1. Other health plans are also eliminating
unpopular restrictions or emphasizing alternative ways to control costs which
are less intrusive in the doctor-patient relationship. See Milt Freudenheim,
Medical Insurers Revise Cost Control Efforts, N.Y. Times, Dec. 3, 1999, at A1.
Widespread dissatisfaction with managed care organizations' cost control efforts
which seem to interfere either with the patients' access to the physicians or
services they want or with their physicians' ability to obtain approval for
recommended treatment have resulted in a societal backlash against HMOs, as
reflected by the popular press in such cover stories as the one which ran in
Newsweek recently, picturing an angry patient and entitled "HMO Hell: The War
Over Patients' Rights." See Newsweek, Nov. 8, 1999. Many people accuse HMOs of
"putting profits before patients," and call for laws to stop their unethical
practices. Geoffrey Cowley & Bill Turque, Critical Condition, Newsweek, Nov. 8,
1999, at 58-62; Russell Watson, HMO Hell: The Backlash - HMOs Go Under the
Knife, Newsweek, Nov. 8, 1999, at 63-68. Anecdotal accounts of HMO denials of
treatment which have resulted in injury or death are now routinely related in
the popular media and in congressional hearings on proposed legislation. See,
e.g., David E. Rosenbaum, House Hears Grim Tales About Managed Care, N.Y. Times,
Oct. 8, 1999, at A23; Robin Toner, Many Doctors Tell of Denial of Coverage by
H.M.O.'s, N.Y. Times, July 29, 1999, at A18. HMO denials of coverage have also
been the subject of numerous lawsuits. See infra note 138. Whether physicians or
health plans should determine whether a given treatment is "medically necessary"
is another "flash point in the congressional debate on managed care patient
protections." Geri Aston, Patients' Rights Backers Seek Clear Definition of
Medical Necessity, Am. Med. News, Mar. 15, 1999, at 9.




n29.  The House and Senate versions of proposed patients' bill of rights
legislation differ as to whether to allow patients to have direct access to
specialists, or to allow health plans to require a referral from a primary care
physician or case manager before a patient may see a specialist. See Senate
Appoints, supra note 26. 36 states allow women either to choose an
obstetric/gynecological specialist as her primary care physician or to have
direct access to these specialist services without first having to get a
referral. See State-By-State Report, supra note 24.




n30.  Dating back to the Hippocratic Oath, keeping the confidences of patients
has been a foundational ethical tenet of the health-care professions. Respect
for individual privacy has never been an absolute principle, however, and it
often has given way to competing ethical concerns for the welfare of the
community. See Amitai Etzioni, Medical Records: Enhancing Privacy, Preserving
the Common Good, 29 Hastings Center Rep. 14 (Mar.-Apr. 1999). Finding social
consensus on where the balance is properly struck among the competing ethical
concerns in myriad health care situations has proven enormously difficult,
however, as reflected in our failure to enact uniform federal legislation in
this area despite years of Congressional debate. Most recently, Congress missed
its own self-imposed deadline of August 21, 1999 to enact comprehensive medical
privacy legislation. Congress established this deadline three years ago when it
enacted the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA)
and it further provided that the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS)
should enact regulations governing the privacy of individually identifiable
health information by February 21, 2000, if Congress did not enact legislation
by its deadline. See Pub. L. No. 104-191, 264(c)(1) (1996). On November 3, 1999,
the Secretary of HHS issued proposed medical privacy regulations, 45 C.F.R. pts.
160 to 164, and she has extended the deadline for public comments until February
17, 2000. See Dept. Health & Human Services, Administrative Simplification
(visited Feb. 15, 2000) < The societal call for minimum federal rules is
responsive to the multitude and intricacies of each state's different laws
governing medical privacy, of which a comprehensive survey was recently
published by the Health Privacy Project of Georgetown University. See Georgetown
University Institute for Health Care & Policy, The State of Health Privacy: An
Uneven Terrain (visited Feb. 15, 2000) <http://www.healthprivacy.
org/resources/statereports/contents.html>.




n31.  Emergency care coverage creates tensions between assuring patients access
for true emergencies and allowing health plans to control their costs by
restricting patients from using the E.R. as a convenient substitute for a
doctor's visit. See Daniel B. Moskowitz, Emergency Care: In Search of Balance,
17 Bus. & Health 15 (1999). Competing versions of proposed federal patients'
bill of rights legislation differ in the extent to which emergency services are
required to be covered by a health plan. See Geri Aston, Patient Protection
Bills Differ, Even in the 'Common Ground', Am. Med. News, Apr. 12, 1999, at 5
(noting wide variations on emergency coverage provisions in competing
proposals); Senate Appoints, supra note 26 (H.R. 2990 would allow patients to
get more services covered by a health plan in connection with out-of-network
emergency care than would S. 1344). 37 states have passed laws requiring health
plans to cover emergency services. See State-By-State Report, supra note 24.
Georgia's Patient Protection Act of 1996 allows emergency services to be
provided without prior managed care authorization. See Ga. Code Ann. 33-20-9
(1996).




n32.  See The Patient Protection Act of 1996, Ga. Code Ann. 33-20A-1 to -10
(1996). Recent legislation amended this Act and, among other things, it gave
insureds the right to sue their HMOs for coverage decisions. See Georgia:
Governor Signs Managed Care Bills Allowing Physician Choice, HMO Lawsuits, 8
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 653 (Apr. 22, 1999) (discussing Ga. Code Ann. 51-1-48 &
51-1-49 (1999)). Georgia became the second state in the country (after Texas) to
allow such lawsuits against HMOs. See William G. Schiffbauer & Dean A. Rosen,
Georgia's Application of Liability to Benefit Administration Ignores Legal
Precedent, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1212 (July 22, 1999) (comparing Texas and
Georgia HMO liability legislation).




n33.  See generally Plan Regulation: Senate Labor Panel Set to Begin Work on
Managed Care Legislation March 17, BNA's Health Care Daily Rep., Mar. 12, 1999
(summarizing state legislation on patient rights); State Legislation: Managed
Care Bills Top State Agendas in 1999; Legislation Pending in Every State, 7
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1996 (Dec. 17, 1998); State Legislation: State Managed Care
Laws Vary Widely, Few Have Broad Protections, Report Says, 7 Health L. Rep.
(BNA) 1162 (July 23, 1998).




n34.  See generally supra notes 23-31. For a comparison of the competing House
and Senate bills, see generally Senate Appoints, supra note 26.




n35.  See George J. Annas, The Standard of Care: The Law of American Bioethics 6
(1993):



   Law and ethics are distinct, though related, activities. The law is
mandatory, setting standards that can only be breached at the risk of civil or
criminal liability. Ethics is aspirational, setting forth universal goals that
we should try to meet, but for which we suffer no temporal penalty when falling
short.



    Dworkin, supra note 1, at 4 ("Law and ethics are not the same thing. Ethics
is a branch of philosophy that considers how persons and institutions ought to
behave. It claims for itself no temporal sanctions to ensure compliance or
punish deviation. Law, conversely, is entirely temporal and very much involved
with sanctions.").




n36.  Even controversial Supreme Court decisions, or other court decisions, can
be taken as "consensus" statements in the sense that these judicial opinions may
be interpreting legislation or constitutional provisions which have been adopted
by majorities through democratic process. On the other hand, if one thinks
judges may be "legislating," or creating new law, through such judicial
interpretation, then it may be harder to characterize these opinions as
"consensus" statements, at least when they are first authored. The same may be
true for judicial common law developments. To the extent that such judicial
interpretations "stand the test of time," however, and are not overturned by
later legislation, case law, or constitutional amendment, their continued
vitality suggests that they reflect this kind of "consensus," or general
agreement, on the correctness of their ethical resolutions. See supra note 4.
The amount of controversy (or lack thereof) generated over a statute or court
decision may well be a gauge of the breadth of the consensus over it. See
Alexander Morgan Capron, Morality and the State, Law, and Legalism, Hastings
Center Rep., Nov.-Dec. 1996, at 35-37:



   To some extent, all societies attempt to direct behavior into approved
channels by criminalizing certain conduct. In doing so, law is not merely
enforcing morality, but reinforcing it, and society's success on the first score
is heavily dependent on the second, that is, on whether a broad consensus is
achieved on the underlying moral view. When wide agreement exists, the law is at
once less visible and more powerful.




n37.  Corporations often use codes of ethics to do the same thing. One author
contrasts two approaches to business ethics codes: the "personal integrity"
approach (which tends also to be the focus of the law) and the "social
responsibility approach" (concerning ethical conduct which law leaves largely
unaddressed). See Leonard J. Weber, The Business of Ethics, Health Progress,
Jan.-Feb. 1990, at 76-78. Like the "personal integrity" approach, law focuses
more on issues of individual integrity (conflicts of interest, self-dealing or
self-interested transactions) rather than those of social responsibility. See
infra note 148 and accompanying text.




n38.  It should be clarified that not everything that is illegal is unethical.
The law is addressed both to acts which are malum in se (a wrong in itself,
something inherently wrong based on natural or moral principles) and to acts
which are malum prohibitum (something which is wrong because it is prohibited,
but is not inherently immoral). See Black's Law Dictionary 494 (5th ed. 1983).
Murder and theft are examples of illegal acts which are malum in se, while
double parking and jaywalking are legal wrongs, not because these actions
violate moral principles, but simply because they are prohibited by law. In
other words, we have some laws that reflect our society's ethical assessment of
certain conduct, and we have some other laws that simply make it possible to
organize civil society efficiently (like our rules of the road). This essay
addresses only the former kind of laws, which reflect societal views on matters
of medical and business ethics.




n39.  The law has long distinguished between acts and omissions, malfeasance and
non-feasance, active misconduct and passive failure to take action to prevent
harm. As a general proposition, the law seeks to sanction only the former. See
Keeton, Law of Torts, supra note 19, at 56.




n40.  See id. at 375 ("The law has persistently refused to impose on a stranger
the moral obligation of common humanity to go to the aid of another human being
who is in danger, even if the other is in danger of losing his life.").




n41.  Callahan, supra note 3, at 34-35.




n42.  See Carl E. Schneider, Moral Discourse, Bioethics, and the Law, Hastings
Center Rep., Nov.-Dec. 1996, at 37-39:



   Once the judicial system has reached some sort of conclusion, then the courts
are poor friends of moral discourse. In short, I have been arguing that the
law's discourse conflicts with what we ordinarily mean by discourse when it
purports to reach an authoritative conclusion and enforces it by claims that
further debate is inappropriate and by force. Indeed, it is exactly this aspect
of legal discourse that makes it so attractive to partisans of all sorts. Law is
more than debate. It is coercion. It is victory, or at least a gratifying step
toward it.




n43.  See Gilbert Meilaender, Less Law? Or Different Law?, Hastings Center Rep.,
Nov.-Dec. 1996, at 39-40:



   The danger, I think, is not exactly or not only that moral problems get
translated into legal problems and that discussion is then terminated.
Inevitably and necessarily the spheres [law and morality] must intersect in
countless ways ... What we need ... is an understanding of law that accepts into
public discussion outlooks that picture the human being as more than just an
isolated principle of will and choice...




n44.  A good example of this problem arises in the treatment of critically ill
newborns. See supra notes 10-14 and accompanying text. A 1988 survey of
neonatalogists indicated that implementation of the Child Abuse and Neglect
Amendments of 1984 (and the second "Baby Doe" regulations still in effect)
resulted in "overtreatment, poor use of resources, and insufficient attention to
suffering." Loretta M. Kopelman et al., Do the "Baby Doe" Rules Ignore
Suffering?, 18 Second Opinion 101, 101-13 (1993). According to one UCLA
physician:



   "I know of several instances where neonatalogists have used Baby Doe
regulations to convince a family that they had no choice but to continue to
treat where the family wanted no treatment."... [In reference to the study
above,] one third of the doctors who said that life-sustaining surgery was not
in an infant's best interests in a hypothetical case said they believed such
treatment nevertheless was required by law. "The conclusion we drew is that the
Baby Doe regulations [for the Amendments] are causing many babies to be
overtreated when their conditions are hopeless...."



    Glazer, supra note 12, at Z8.




n45.  See generally Marshall B. Kapp, Treating Medical Charts Near the End of
Life: How Legal Anxieties Inhibit Good Patient Deaths, 28 U. Tol. L. Rev. 521
(1997) (discussing the negative influence of defensive medicine on the clinical
and ethical quality of medical care at the end of patients' lives). See also
Annas, supra note 35, at 4-5 ("It should be emphasized at the outset that any
medical treatment done primarily to protect the physician from potential
lawsuits (rather than to benefit the patient), although sometimes legal, is by
definition unethical.").




n46.  See infra notes 75-83 and accompanying text. This legal power/ethical
pitfall problem is later explored in the context of business ethics. See infra
notes 150-54 (discussing corporate compliance programs).




n47.  See Ruth R. Faden et al., A History and Theory of Informed Con-sent 9-10,
61-76 (1986). "Before the mid-twentieth century, the beneficence model ... was
the only operative model of the physician's responsibility to the patient." Id.
at 100-01. For an exhaustive account of the four-principles (autonomy,
beneficence, non-maleficence, and justice) approach to medical ethics, see
Raanan Gillon, Principles of Health Care Ethics pt. 1 (1994).




n48.  See Faden et al., supra note 47, at 86-91 (suggesting that the late 1950s
and early 1960s marked the beginning of change from a beneficence model to an
autonomy model in informed consent theory).




n49.  See id. at 100 ("Informed consent did not become an issue in medicine
until the twentieth century, although we have seen evidence of consent-seeking
and the respecting of patient refusals in the nineteenth century."). See also
Jay Katz, The Silent World of Doctor and Patient 4, 49-50 (1986):



   The history of the physician-patient relationship from ancient times to the
present ... bears testimony to physicians' inattention to their patients' right
and need to make their own decisions... [Although] consent to surgical
interventions is an ancient legal requirement ... [such consent was not
meaningful consent] because there was no right for patients to decide, after
having been properly informed, whether an intervention was agreeable to them in
light of its risks and benefits as well as available alternatives.




n50.  See, e.g., Schloendorff v. Soc'y of N.Y. Hosp., 105 N.E. 92, 93 (N.Y.
1914) (Cardozo, J.) ("Every human being of adult years and sound mind has a
right to determine what shall be done with his own body; and a surgeon who
performs an operation without his patient's consent commits an assault, for
which he is liable in damages."). See also Harris v. Leader, 499 S.E.2d 374 (Ga.
Ct. App. 1998):



   The relationship of doctor and patient is a consensual one, and any
unauthorized and unprivileged contact by a doctor with his patient in
examination, treatment or surgery would amount to a battery. In the interest of
one's general right of inviolability of his person, any unlawful touching of
that type is a physical injury to the person and is actionable.



    In Georgia, for example, a patient may still have a cause of action for
battery when the surgeon exceeds the scope of the patient's consent, see, e.g.,
Johnson v. Srivastava, 405 S.E.2d 725 (Ga. Ct. App. 1991) (holding battery claim
was appropriate where patient alleged that she had consented only to an
"excision biopsy" whereas physician had performed a complete excision of a mass
on her face without first obtaining a biopsy), or obtained the patient's consent
by fraudulent misrepresentations, see, e.g., Lloyd v. Kramer, 503 S.E.2d 632
(Ga. Ct. App. 1998) (where the patient was allowed to sue a podiatrist for,
among other things, battery based on allegations that he obtained patient's
consent to unnecessary and inappropriate hammer toe surgery through fraudulent
misrepresentations).




n51.  See Faden et al., supra note 47, at 93-95, 101 ("[The American Hospital
Association's 1972] Patient's Bill of Rights was connected to various consumer
and civil-rights movements that were everywhere demanding increased rights to
make free and informed decisions.").




n52.  See generally id. at 114-50.




n53.  See, e.g., Canterbury v. Spence, 464 F.2d 772 (D.C. Cir. 1972); Cobbs v.
Grant, 502 P.2d 1 (Cal. 1972).




n54.  Georgia was one of the last states to adopt a legal duty of informed
consent, which it enacted in a limited form by statute in 1989. Before 1989,
numerous cases in Georgia established that once a doctor had informed a patient
in general terms of the treatment or course of treatment proposed for the
patient, the doctor had no further duty to disclose the risks of treatment. See
Padgett v. Ferrier, 323 S.E.2d 166 (Ga. Ct. App. 1985) (and citations therein).
Under the 1989 amendment to Georgia's Medical Consent Law, specific disclosures
were required to be made to the patient, including (a) diagnosis of patient's
condition; (b) nature and purpose of proposed procedure; (c) material risks of
the procedure; (d) likelihood of success; (e) practical and generally recognized
alternatives; and (f) patient's prognosis without the procedure. See Ga. Code
Ann. 31-9-6.1 (1996).




n55.  See Faden et al., supra note 47, at 139 (by 1982, thirty states had
replaced common-law developments in informed consent with statutes on informed
consent).




n56.  To put it bluntly, these legal developments in informed consent caused
medicine to be "jolted from an exclusive preoccupation with a beneficence model
to awareness of an autonomy model of responsibility for the patient." Id. at
142. See also Katz, supra note 49, at 1 ("disclosure and consent, except in the
most rudimentary fashion, are obligations alien to medical thinking and
practice").




n57.  See Annas, supra note 35, at 3 ("Law sides with patients to oppose the
arbitrary use of power whether by physicians or the government; the rubric is
patient rights. This is why American law, not philosophy or medicine, is
primarily responsible for the agenda, development and current state of American
bioethics."); Faden et al., supra note 47, at 101:



   Amid the convergence of complicated social causes and reasons that may never
be properly sifted by historians, it was case law that introduced the concept of
informed consent to medicine in the mid-twentieth century using the language of
"self-determination." Shortly thereafter, informed consent was transformed in a
social context beyond law from a malpractice issue to a moral duty incumbent on
physicians, one straightforwardly linked to the principle of respect for
autonomy.




n58.  See Carl E. Schneider, Making Sausage: The Ninth Circuit's Opinion,
Hastings Center Rep., Jan.-Feb. 1997, at 28 ("The history of bioethics is in no
small part a reaction to the sobering number of doctors who have not been driven
to understand patients' wishes, who have not understood them, and who have
ignored them even when they have understood them.").




n59.  See In re Karen Ann Quinlan, 355 A.2d 647 (N.J. 1976).




n60.  See id. at 655 ("it seemed to be the consensus not only of the treating
physicians but also of the several qualified experts who testified in the case,
that removal from the respirator would not conform to medical practices,
standards, and traditions"). Twenty years later, many doctors are now taking the
contrary ethical position, and are urging that medical ethics allows (and maybe
obliges) doctors to remove a permanently unconscious patient like Quinlan from
life support they deem to be futile, even if the patient's surrogate objects to
its removal. See infra note 85.




n61.  See generally Furrow et al., supra note 9, at 403-16 (collecting cases and
discussing potential civil liability for providers' failure to recognize
patient's or surrogate's decision to forego life-sustaining treatment). In a
recent case in Texas, parents who had decided against having doctors resuscitate
their infant born prematurely at 22 weeks gestation won a $ 42.9 million verdict
for doctors having resuscitated the infant against parents' wishes. See Jury
Returns $ 42.9 Million Verdict in Case of Brain-Damaged Baby, 7 Health Law Rep.
(BNA) 183 (Jan. 29, 1998).




n62.  See supra notes 4, 36.




n63.  See Cruzan v. Director, Mo. Dep't of Health, 497 U.S. 261 (1990). The
Court characterized this case as "the first case in which we have been squarely
presented with the issue of whether the United States Constitution grants what
is in common parlance referred to as a 'right to die.'" Id. at 277. The Court
assumed, for the purposes of the case, "the United States Constitution would
grant a competent person a constitutionally protected right to refuse lifesaving
hydration and nutrition." Id. at 279.




n64.  See National Survey of State Laws 441-96 (Richard A. Leiter ed., 2d ed.
1997) (identifying forty-nine states' legislation concerning advance
directives). Since publication of this volume, the fiftieth state, Alabama, has
amended its statute to provide for durable powers of attorney for health care.
See Ala. Code 26-1-2 (1998).




n65.  42 U.S.C. 1395cc, 1396a (1992).




n66.  While the courts have not framed their analysis in the terms of the
conventional four principles of medical ethics (autonomy, beneficence,
non-maleficence, and justice, see supra note 47, they have adopted an
analytical, four-factor framework that parallels closely those principles. The
four countervailing "state interests" which courts have identified as important
to balance against the patient's (autonomy) interest in refusing medical
treatment are: (1) preserving life, (2) preventing suicide, (3) protecting the
ethical integrity of the medical profession, and (4) protecting the interests of
innocent third parties. See, e.g., Bartling v. Super. Ct., 209 Cal. Rptr. 220
(Ct. App. 2d 1984); State v. McAfee, 385 S.E.2d 651 (Ga. 1989); Superintendent
of Belchertown State Sch. v. Saikewicz, 370 N.E.2d 417 (Mass. 1977).




n67.  See, e.g., Norwood Hosp. v. Munoz, 564 N.E.2d 1017 (Mass. 1991); Fosmire
v. Nicoleau, 551 N.E.2d 77 (N.Y. 1990).




n68.  See, e.g., Stamford Hosp. v. Vega, 674 A.2d 821 (Conn. 1996); In re
Dubreuil, 629 So. 2d 819 (Fla. 1993).




n69.  See, e.g., Bouvia v. Super. Ct., 225 Cal. Rptr. 297 (Ct. App. 2d Dist.
1986) (quadriplegic); Satz v. Perlmutter, 362 So. 2d 160 (Fla. Dist. Ct. App.
1978) (Lou Gehrig's disease); State v. McAfee, 385 S.E.2d 651 (Ga. 1989)
(quadriplegic).




n70.  See, e.g., Thor v. Super. Ct., 855 P.2d 375 (Cal. 1993); Zant v. Prevatte,
286 S.E.2d 715 (Ga. 1982). But see Schuetzle v. Vogel, 537 N.W.2d 358 (N.D.
1995) (holding that the state's interest in orderly prison administration
outweighs a prisoner's right to refuse treatment, and specifically stating that
"we, like every court that has considered Zant, refuse to follow it"). In the
case of federal prisoners, courts have upheld the prison's force-feeding of
inmates, citing either constitutional bases, see, e.g., In re John Doe, 150 F.3d
170 (2d Cir. 1998) (stating that the state's interests in preserving life and
orderly prison administration outweigh the prisoner's right to refuse
treatment), or Bureau of Prisons Regulation, see, e.g., Martinez v. Turner, 977
F.2d 421, 423 (8th Cir. 1992). See also 28 C.F.R. 549.65 (1994) (authorizing
force-feeding after medical evaluation).




n71.  See, e.g., Novak v. Cobb County-Kennestone Hosp. Auth., 849 F. Supp. 1559
(N.D. Ga. 1994), aff'd, 74 F.3d 1173 (11th Cir. 1996) (holding that a "mature
minor" does not have the right to refuse medical treatment under the U.S.
Constitution or Georgia law).




n72.  See, e.g., Application of the Pres. & Dirs. of Georgetown College, Inc.,
331 F.2d 1000 (D.C. Cir. 1964) (ordering blood transfusion of Jehovah's Witness
mother of infant child).




n73.  See, e.g., Jefferson v. Griffin Spalding County Hosp. Auth., 274 S.E.2d
457 (Ga. 1981) (holding the state may intervene on behalf of fetus and require
pregnant woman to have cesarean section surgery).




n74.  Some courts have held that a competent pregnant woman has the right to
refuse cesarean section surgery, even when such refusal may threaten the welfare
of her fetus. See, e.g., In re A.C., 573 A.2d 1235 (D.C. 1990); In re Baby Boy
Doe, 632 N.E.2d 326 (Ill. App. Ct. 1994) (recognizing right of refusal). One
recent decision permitted a pregnant woman to refuse less invasive medical care
- a blood transfusion - which doctors had recommended for the welfare of her
fetus. See In re Brown, 689 N.E.2d 397 (Ill. App. Ct. 1997). See generally
Charity Scott, Resisting the Temptation to Turn Medical Recommendations into
Judicial Orders: A Reconsideration of Court-Ordered Surgery for Pregnant Women,
10 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 615 (1994).




n75.  See supra notes 4, 36 and accompanying text.




n76.  See, e.g., David A. Asch et al., Decisions to Limit Life-Sustaining
Treatment By Critical Care Physicians in the United States: Conflicts Between
Physicians' Practices and Patients' Wishes, 151 Am. J. Respir. Care Med. 288,
288-92 (1995) (one-third of surveyed physicians continued life-sustaining
measures despite patient or surrogate wishes that it be discontinued); Kapp,
supra note 45, at 524-37 (providing examples of medically inappropriate
treatment near the end of life as a result of physicians' fears of legal
liability); Philip G. Peters, Jr., The Illusion of Autonomy at the End of Life:
Unconsented Life Support and the Wrongful Life Analogy, 45 UCLA L. Rev. 673
(1998) (citing numerous studies which suggest that physicians routinely ignore
patient preferences about life-sustaining care); SUPPORT Principal
Investigators, A Controlled Trial to Improve Care for Seriously Ill Hospitalized
Patients: The Study to Understand Prognoses and Preferences for Outcomes and
Risks of Treatments, 274 JAMA 1591, 1591-98 (1995) (reporting findings of a
large study that many physicians were unaware of or ignored their patients'
preferences concerning CPR, and that terminally ill patients were hooked up to
mechanical ventilation despite their preferences, and were dying in pain). There
are a number of cases where allegedly unwanted care was provided despite the
presence of a patient's advance directive. See, e.g., Roberts v. Jones, 475
S.E.2d 193 (Ga. Ct. App. 1996); Allore v. Flower Hosp., 699 N.E.2d 560 (Ohio Ct.
App. 1997). See also Furrow et al., supra note 9 (discussing potential civil
liability for failure to respect patient's decision); Peters, supra (arguing
that liability should be imposed on a physician who wrongfully administers
life-sustaining care over the objection of the patient or surrogate); Tamar
Lewin, Ignoring "Right to Die," Medical Community Is Being Sued, N. Y. Times,
June 2, 1996, at 1 ("there is a new wave of lawsuits seeking to hold hospitals,
nursing homes and doctors liable for ignoring living wills and other advance
directives").




n77.  See Annas, supra note 35, at 3 ("American law, especially civil rights
law, is dedicated to fostering individual rights, equality and justice. Law
sides with patients to oppose the arbitrary use of power whether by physicians
or the government; the rubric is patients' rights.").




n78.  See 1 Furrow et al., supra note 9, at 439 ("A consent form, or other
written documentation of the patient's verbal consent, is treated in many states
as presumptively valid consent to the treatment at issue, with the burden on the
patient to rebut the presumption."). See also infra note 79.




n79.  Actually, you can still get sued, but you have increased your chances of
defending a malpractice suit successfully. In Georgia, for example, for surgical
or diagnostic treatment involving anesthesia, amniocentesis, or injection of
contrast material, if the consent form discloses in writing certain specific
matters - diagnosis, material risks, likelihood of success, and alternatives -
and is signed by the patient, then it is rebuttably presumed to be valid
consent. See Ga. Code Ann. 31-9-6.1(a), (b)(2) (1996). For all other treatment,
if the consent form discloses in general terms the course of treatment and is
signed and in writing, then it is conclusively presumed to be valid consent in
the absence of fraud. See id. at 31-9-6(d).




n80.  See supra notes 37-40 and accompanying text.




n81.  See generally Kapp, supra note 45, at 524-37, 544-46 (discussing how
physicians' misunderstandings of the law can lead to medically inappropriate and
ethically dubious treatment of critically ill and dying patients).




n82.  See Faden et al., supra note 47, at 100:



   Katz seems right in his thesis that informed consent has not changed the
fundamental character of the physician-patient relationship... The beneficence
model is [still] overwhelmingly predominant. Patients routinely acquiesce to
medical interventions rather than autonomously authorizing them. From this
perspective all the changes [over the past century] are surface displays, while
below the surface there are no more real 'informed consents' than in the past.



    See also Bruce V. Corsino, Bioethics Committees and JCAHO Patients' Rights
Standards: A Question of Balance, 7 J. Clin. Ethics 177, 179 (1996) (describing
providers' experiences with informed consent and advance directives as
"unhelpful, non-medical procedures"); Alan Meisel & Mark Kucsewski, Legal and
Ethical Myths About Informed Consent, 156 Arch. Int. Med. 2521 (1996)
(attributing physicians' negative reactions to informed consent to fundamental
misunderstandings about what informed consent requires); Informed Consent - Not,
Sci. News, July 4, 1998, at 15 (reporting on two studies which raise questions
about the utility of informed consent forms as an aid to patient
decision-making).




n83.  See 1 Furrow et al., supra note 9, at 439-41:



   These forms operate as a legal surrogate for consent, sometimes memorializing
an actual physician-patient discussion, sometimes acting simply as a fiction...
Written consent forms predominate in institutional settings, given bureaucratic
pressures for a complete patient record, a desire to protect against litigation,
and a sense that something is better than nothing. They are often reduced to
little more than a bureaucratic formality that the institution hopes will erect
a defense shield against malpractice liability.



    See also John Lantos, Informed Consent: The Whole Truth for Patients?, 72
Cancer 2811, 2813 (Supp. 1993) ("Informed consent forms become waivers of
liability.").




n84.  See 42 U.S.C. 1395dd (1992). See also supra notes 15-16 and accompanying
text.




n85.  Unilateral efforts by physicians to terminate life-sustaining treatment
they consider futile for a patient over the objections of the patient or the
patient's family have generated public controversy and litigation. In the case
of Helga Wanglie, a medical center unsuccessfully sought to replace the
patient's husband as her guardian when he refused to consent to the removal of
her respirator, which treatment the doctors regarded as inappropriate and
"non-beneficial" in light of the patient's persistent vegetative state. See
Marcia Angell, The Case of Helga Wanglie: A New Kind of "Right to Die", 325 New
Eng. J. Med. 511 (1991); Steven H. Miles, Informed Demand for "Non-Beneficial"
Medical Treatment, 325 New Eng. J. Med. 512 (1991). In the case of Catherine
Gilgunn, a jury found doctors and a hospital not liable for withdrawing
ventilator support from a comatose and severely brain-damaged patient whose
daughter had objected to the withdrawal and insisted that her mother would have
wanted the aggressive treatment. See Alexander Morgan Capron, Abandoning a Life,
Hastings Center Rep., July-Aug. 1995, at 24; Gina Kolata, Court Ruling Limits
Rights of Patients, N. Y. Times, Apr. 22, 1995, at A6. See also Velez v.
Bethune, 466 S.E.2d 627 (Ga. Ct. App. 1995) (denying a motion to dismiss, court
observed that doctor "had no right to decide, unilaterally, to discontinue
medical treatment even if, as the record in this case reflects, the child was
terminally ill and in the process of dying. That decision must be made with the
consent of the parents."); infra note 88.




n86.  Public debate over who decides what health plans and insurance companies
should pay for continues amid controversial damage awards and "horror stories"
after some payers have denied coverage for treatments they consider unproven,
experimental, or not medically necessary. See, e.g., Christine Gorman et al.,
Playing the HMO Game: Denied Viagra and Inflamed by Horror Stories, Consumers
Put Health Reform Back on the Front Burner, Time, July 13, 1998, at 22
(describing numerous cases of denied coverage); Tom Hamburger, Clinton Presses
for Patients' Bill of Rights: An Apple Valley Woman Relates Her HMO Trouble,
Minneapolis-St. Paul Star Trib., May 29, 1998, at 10A (stating that President
Clinton urged Congress to pass a patients' bill of rights, citing example of
woman with breast cancer denied chemotherapy by her HMO); Ron Winslow & Rhonda
L. Rundle, Aetna Reels in Wake of $ 116 Million Damages Verdict, Wall St. J.,
Jan. 22, 1999, at B4 (describing large jury awards for denials of bone-marrow
transplant coverage in the cases of Teresa Goodrich's husband, who died of
stomach cancer, and Nelene Fox, who had breast cancer). Even studies designed to
determine the efficacy of costly new medical treatments seem unlikely to quell
the public debate over whether they should be covered by health payers. See
Nancy Ann Jeffrey & Michael Waldholz, Studies Are Likely to Question Breast
Cancer Therapy, Wall St. J., Mar. 24, 1999, at B1 (noting that four landmark
studies of aggressive chemotherapy-transplant treatment for breast cancer "are
likely to spark a firestorm of controversy"); infra note 89.




n87.  The moral and social debate over the ethics of physicians collaborating
with patients to hasten their deaths continues both inside and outside
courtrooms and legislatures. Jack Kevorkian of Michigan has given high
visibility to the public debate over physician-assisted suicide, which will
probably not be diminished by his March 1999 conviction of second-degree murder
for administering a lethal injection to a man with Lou Gehrig's disease. See Sue
Ellen Christian, Opponents Fear Making Martyr of Kevorkian; Conviction Leaves
Debate Unfinished, Chicago Trib., Mar. 28, 1999, at 3. Having assisted in the
deaths of approximately 130 persons since 1990, Kevorkian had been
unsuccessfully prosecuted four times before for his role in providing suicide
assistance. See Julie Grace, Curtains for Dr. Death, Time, Apr. 5, 1999, at 48.
There is also evidence that medical and nursing professionals have assisted in
the suicides of their patients. See, e.g., Ezekiel J. Emanuel et al., The
Practice of Euthanasia and Physician-Assisted Suicide in the United States, 280
JAMA 507 (1998) (stating that approximately fifteen percent of surveyed
oncologists reported participating in euthanasia or physician-assisted suicide);
Lee R. Slome et al., Physician-Assisted Suicide and Patients with Human
Immunodeficiency Virus Disease, 336 New Eng. J. Med. 417 (1997) (relating that a
majority of San Francisco-area physicians caring for HIV/AIDS patients who
responded to the survey said they had granted at least one patient's request for
assisted suicide). Acknowledging that the medical profession has historically
failed to address serious deficiencies in the care of dying patients, the AMA
has undertaken a number of reform initiatives to improve physicians' skills in
the field of end-of-life care, as well as to educate patients on the quality of
care they should expect. See, e.g., Kathleen M. Foley, Competent Care for the
Dying Instead of Physician-Assisted Suicide, 336 New Eng. J. Med. 54 (1997);
Diane M. Gianelli, Assisted Suicide Case Consensus: We Need Better End-of-Life
Care, Am. Med. News, Apr. 1997, at 1; Diane M. Gianelli, Report Says Myths
Dominate End-of-Life Care Debate, Am. Med. News, May 19, 1997, at 8; Daniel P.
Sulmasy & Joanne Lynn, Contempo: End-of-Life Care, 277 JAMA 1854 (1997); AMA
Hosts Innovative Seminar Addressing End-of-Life Care, Am. Med. News, Feb. 15,
1999, at 24; Warren E. Leary, Many in U.S. Denied Dignified Death: Health Panel
Asserts That Too Little Is Done to Ease End of Life Care, N.Y. Times, June 5,
1997, at A13; infra note 90.




n88.  For example, litigation under EMTALA has established the right of an
infant with anencephaly (i.e., without a brain) to receive life-saving medical
treatment in a hospital's emergency room, even though doctors believed that such
extraordinary measures were outside the medical standard of care and that such
treatment was both medically futile and ethically inappropriate to render. See
In re Baby K, 16 F.3d 590 (4th Cir. 1994); but cf.  Bryan v. Rectors & Visitors
of the Univ. of Va., 95 F.3d 349 (4th Cir. 1996) (holding that EMTALA did not
require doctors to continue treating a woman who had been treated at the
hospital for 12 days for an emergency condition). While there are few laws
directly addressing the problem of futile treatment (Virginia is the only state
with a statute permitting doctors to withhold such care, but it was held to have
been preempted by EMTALA in the Baby K case), the literature on the topic of
medical futility is voluminous. For views that doctors should not be required
(ethically or legally) to render care they believe to be futile, see, for
example, Howard Brody, The Physician's Role in Determining Futility, 42 J. Am.
Geriatrics Soc'y 875 (1994); John J. Paris & Frank E. Reardon, Physician Refusal
of Requests for Futile or Ineffective Interventions, 1 Cambridge Q. Healthcare
Ethics 127 (1992); Lawrence J. Schneiderman & Nancy S. Jecker, Is the Treatment
Beneficial, Experimental, or Futile?, 5 Cambridge Q. Healthcare Ethics 248
(1996). For contrary views that doctors do have such an obligation, see, for
example, Felicia Ackerman, The Significance of a Wish, Hastings Center Rep.,
July-Aug. 1991, at 27; Robert M. Veatch, Why Physicians Cannot Determine If Care
Is Futile, 42 J. Am. Geriatrics Soc'y 871 (1994); Susan Wolf, Near Death - In
the Moment of Decision, 322 New Eng. J. Med. 208 (1990). See generally Daniel
Callahan, Medical Futility, Medical Necessity: The-Problem-Without-A-Name,
Hastings Center Rep., July-Aug. 1991, at 30. For a recent recommendation that
all hospitals develop a medical futility policy, see AMA Council on Ethical &
Jud. Affairs, Medical Futility in End-of-Life Care, 281 JAMA 937 (1999).




n89.  Insurers and employers have attempted to exclude, by the terms of the
health insurance policy, costly treatments which have not yet been
scientifically proven to be beneficial or which they consider still
experimental. A common area of litigation has been over high-dose chemotherapy
with autologous bone marrow transplant (HDC/ABMT) or with peripheral stem cell
recovery (HDC/PSCR) for advanced breast cancer. Courts have split in their
interpretations of these contractual limitations. Some courts have construed
such contractual exclusions against the insurers by finding the policy language
ambiguous, thus finding that the patients were entitled to coverage. See, e.g.,
Bailey v. Blue Cross & Blue Shield of Va., 67 F.3d 53 (4th Cir. 1995); Frendreis
v. Blue Cross & Blue Shield of Mich., 873 F. Supp. 1153 (N.D. Ill. 1995). Other
courts have held that the contractual exclusions unambiguously precluded
coverage. See, e.g., Bechtold v. Physicians Health Plan of N. Ind., 19 F.3d 322
(7th Cir. 1994); Fuja v. Benefit Trust Life Ins. Co., 18 F.3d 1405 (7th Cir.
1994). See generally John A. Bourdeau, Annotation, Propriety of Denial of
Medical or Hospital Benefits for Investigative, Educational, or Experimental
Medical Procedures Pursuant to Exclusion Contained in ERISA-Governed Health
Plan, 122 A.L.R. Fed. 1 (1998) (in 3, collecting cases involving denials of
high-dose chemotherapy and autologous bone marrow transplant as treatment for
breast cancer); Norman Daniels & James E. Sabin, Last Chance Therapies and
Managed Care: Pluralism, Fair Procedures, and Legitimacy, Hastings Center Rep.,
Mar.-Apr. 1998, at 27 (1998) (analyzing how health plans can make fair
determinations about when to cover as-yet unproven and costly treatments). Some
litigation has been brought under the anti-discrimination laws, raising the
question whether a health plan's denial of coverage for treatment of breast
cancer by high-dose chemotherapy and autologous bone marrow transplant
(HDC/ABMT) on the grounds that treatment was experimental constitutes
discrimination under Americans with Disabilities Act. See Henderson v. Bodine
Aluminum, 70 F.3d 958 (8th Cir. 1995) (arguably YES, remanding case to district
court). See generally Laurie Dechery, Note, Preferential Treatment or
Discriminatory Standards: Do Employer-Provided Insurance Plans Violate Title VII
When They Exclude Treatment for Breast Cancer?, 80 Minn. L. Rev. 945 (1996)
(arguing such policy exclusions constitute discrimination under Title VII).




n90.  The U.S. Supreme Court has ruled that mentally competent, terminally ill
patients do not have a right protected by the federal constitution to receive a
physician's assistance in committing suicide by obtaining a prescription of
lethal drugs. See Vacco v. Quill, 521 U.S. 793 (1997) (finding no denial of
Equal Protection under 14th Amendment); Washington v. Glucksberg, 521 U.S. 702
(1997) (finding no liberty interest under Due Process Clause of 14th Amendment).
The issue of physician-assisted suicide has prompted legislative activity at
both the federal level, see, e.g., Federal Assisted Suicide Funding Restriction
Act, 42 U.S.C. 14401 (Supp. 1997) (prohibiting use of federal funds to subsidize
physician-assisted suicide), and the state level. At least 37 states and
territories have statutes which specifically ban assisted suicide. See Stephanie
Graboyes-Russo, Too Costly Too Live: The Moral Hazards of a Decision in
Washington v. Glucksberg and Vacco v. Quill, 51 U. Miami L. Rev. 907, 912 n.29
(1997) (collecting statutes). In several other states, assisted suicide is
illegal under case law or negligent homicide statutes. See id. at 912-13 n.30
(citing laws or cases in Alabama, Wyoming, North Carolina, South Carolina, Ohio,
and Massachusetts). Under state statutes authorizing advance directives, such as
living wills or durable powers of attorney for health care, 45 States and the
District of Columbia expressly disapprove of assisted suicide or mercy killing.
See Edward R. Grant & Paul Benjamin Linton, Relief or Reproach: Euthanasia
Rights in the Wake of Measure 16, 74 Or. L. Rev. 449, 462-63 nn.44-46 (1995).
With the exception of Oregon, discussed infra, no state expressly authorizes the
practice of assisted suicide. In addition, since 1994, proposals to legalize
assisted suicide have been introduced in at least seventeen different state
legislatures, yet none has been enacted. See Glucksberg, 521 U.S. at 717 n.15.
After two voter referendums, Oregon has passed a law permitting physician
assistance in hastening death under certain circumstances. See Or. Rev. Stat.
127.800 (1996). For a report on Oregon's experience with its new law, see Arthur
E. Chin et al., Legalized Physician-Assisted Suicide In Oregon - The First
Year's Experience, 340 New. Eng. J. Med. 577 (1999).




n91.  See Thrust into the Spotlight, Am. Med. News, Aug. 17, 1998, at 21. Dr. E.
Ratcliffe Anderson Jr., Executive Vice President of the AMA, characterized the
heart of the AMA's work as "doing what is right for patients," and he said
pushing for a federal patients' bill of rights was one of the highest AMA
priorities "that places everything else on the back burner." Id.; see also infra
note 92. This new campaign for adoption of a patients' bill of rights at the
federal level broadens the AMA's earlier efforts "for these patient protections
in piecemeal fashion - one issue at a time, often one state at a time." Thomas
R. Reardon, From the AMA Board Chair: AMA to Continue to Push for "Patient Bill
of Rights", Am. Med. News, Dec. 22, 1997, at 17, 19. A primary focus of AMA
advocacy will continue to be patient protection. See The Big Picture, Am. Med.
News, Mar. 8, 1999. See also supra notes 23-31 (discussing federal proposals and
state legislation for patients' bill of rights). It was not until 1996 that the
editors at the Journal of the American Medical Association announced the
inauguration of a new column in the journal devoted to "the patient-physician
relationship," calling it the "center of medicine" and urging physicians to
"resist any compromises of the trust this relationship requires." Richard M.
Glass, The Patient-Physician Relationship: JAMA Focuses on the Center of
Medicine, 275 JAMA 147 (1996). The first featured article addressed to this
now-central subject chronicled the history of "patient-centered medicine."
Christine Laine & Frank Davidoff, Patient-Centered Medicine: A Professional
Evolution, 275 JAMA 152 (1996).




n92.  Randolf D. Smoak, AMA Agenda for 1999: A Year of Opportunity, Am. Med.
News, Jan. 4, 1999. This aggressive campaign in the name of patients' rights
continues the AMA's legislative lobbying efforts from 1998. See Aggressive AMA
Campaign Aimed at Correcting Abuses by Health Plans, Am. Med. News, Aug. 3,
1998, at 21 [hereinafter Aggressive AMA]; AMA Advocates for a "Patients' Bill of
Rights", 280 JAMA 310 (1998) [hereinafter AMA Advocates]. The AMA credits its
lobbying efforts as key in securing the recent passage in the House of a
patients' rights bill. See Linn Weiss & Catherine Hamrick, One Giant Step Closer
to Patients' Rights, Am. Med. News, Nov. 1, 1999, at 20.




n93.  The American Hospital Association first adopted "A Patient's Bill of
Rights" in 1973. Its latest revision was approved by the AHA Board of Trustees
on October 21, 1992. See American Hospital Association, Management Advisory: A
Patient's Bill of Rights (visited Mar. 13, 1999) <http://www.aha.org/resource/
pbillofrights.html>.




n94.  AAHP Approves New Patient Protections, 7 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 351 (Feb.
26, 1998). A group of HMOs has also announced its allegiance to patient
protection (they call it "consumer" protection) and called for national legal
regulation of managed care plans. See Robert Pear, Three Big Health Plans Join
in Call for National Standards, N.Y. Times, Sept. 25, 1997, at 28 (Kaiser
Permanente, HIP Health Insurance Plans, and the Group Health Cooperative of
Puget Sound joined in issuing a "statement of principles for consumer
protection"). For a skeptical view about the AAHP's "Putting Patients First"
initiative, see Jerome P. Kassirer, Managing Managed Care's Tarnished Image, 337
New Eng. J. Med. 338, 338-39 (1997) (arguing that it "amounts to little more
than a thinly veiled attempt to ward off state and federal legislative actions
to curb the abuses of managed care").




n95.  See supra notes 23-31.




n96.  Glass, supra note 91, at 147. Note also the AMA's "battle" language to
describe its campaign for patient protection legislation. See id.




n97.  See AMA Advocates, supra note 92, at 310 ("The American Medical
Association has launched an intensive, nationwide campaign that it hopes will
result in the enactment of a 'bill of rights' to protect patients from abusive
health plan practices.").




n98.  See Aggressive AMA, supra note 92, at 21 (The AMA campaign "emphasizes the
rights of both patients and physicians, which ... are intertwined... If the
physician stands up to the health plan, it is the physician who suffers. If the
physician is forced to buckle under, it is the patient who suffers.").




n99.  See supra note 77 and accompanying text.




n100.  No less a figure than Dr. Arnold Relman, editor emeritus of the New
England Journal of Medicine, has in the past urged: "State and federal
legislatures must be prepared to develop, together with organized medicine, laws
that will define the limits of ethical practice." Janice Perrone, Physician,
Police Thyself: Can Renewed Emphasis on Ethics Blunt Government Regulation, Am.
Med. News, Apr. 27, 1992, at 3.




n101.  See 1 Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations, 1995
Accreditation Manual for Hospitals Standard RI.4-RI.4.2 (1995) [hereinafter 1995
JCAHO Manual]. This 1995 edition of the Accreditation Manual introduced the
standard under the heading "Patient Rights and Organizational Ethics," although
JCAHO has changed the phrase from "organizational ethics" to "organization
ethics" in later editions of the accreditation and standards volumes.




n102.  Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations, 1998
Hospital Accreditation Standards Standard RI.4.4 (1998) [hereinafter JCAHO 1998
Standards].




n103.  See 1995 JCAHO Manual, supra note 101, Standard RI.1-RI.1.3. JCAHO has
parallel requirements for organization ethics codes for managed care plans which
it accredits. See Managed Care: MCOs Embrace Ethics Committees to Tackle Tough
Treatment Decisions, 7 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 683 (1998). For health care
networks, see JCAHO Releases Accreditation Standards for Evaluating Health Care
Networks, 3 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 15 (1994).




n104.  See Francis J. Aguilar, Managing Corporate Ethics 61 (1994) ("By one
account, over 80 percent of major corporations have adopted codes of ethics.").




n105.  Managed Care Brings a Demand for Institutional Ethics Policies, 10 Med.
Ethics Advisor 125 [hereinafter Managed Care].




n106.  Id. at 128.




n107.  JCAHO 1998 Standards, supra note 102, at 55 (setting out, for mandatory
compliance, the "Intent of RI.4 Through RI.4.2").




n108.  Compare 2 1995 JCAHO Manual, supra note 101, at 23 (requiring that an
organization have in place the mechanism described), with JCAHO 1998 Standards
("The code ensures that the hospital conducts its business and patient care
practices in an honest, decent, and proper manner.").




n109.  See HLR's Top 10 Health Law Developments for 1998, 7 Health L. Rep. (BNA)
5 (1998); HLR's Top 10 Health Law Issues for 1999, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 5
(1999).




n110.  See Roundup: DOJ Recovered $ 1.2 Billion in Fiscal 1997 in Fight Against
Health Fraud, Report Says, 7 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1793 (1998) [hereinafter DOJ
Recovered]. See also Peter Eisler & Barbara Pearson, Feds Triple Health Fraud
Cases / Crackdown Hits Medicare Billing Abuses, USA Today, Feb. 23, 1999, at 1A
(stating that U.S. attorneys prosecuted 552 criminal cases of health care fraud
in 1997; the Medicare program lost an estimated $ 12.6 billion last year (six
percent of its expenditures) to fraud and abuse; and civil and criminal
enforcement actions in 1998 resulted in approximately $ 500 million in
judgments, settlements, and fines).




n111.  See Ursala Himali, Fraud: Government Approach to Investigating False
Claims Varies By Initiative, 6 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 45, d39 (1997) ("law
enforcement's approach to investigating the submission of false claims to
federal and state health insurance programs is multidimensional, and there is no
end in sight to the initiatives being launched").




n112.  See id. (referring to an investigation targeting fraudulent billing by
the nation's largest independent clinical laboratories).




n113.  See Himali, supra note 111, at 48 ("Since December 1994, the Pennsylvania
U.S. Attorney's Office has been investigating abuses of the '72-hour rule' which
stipulates that hospitals cannot submit separate bills to cover certain
outpatient tests if the Medicare patient is admitted to the hospital within 72
hours of the test."); Health Fraud Comprises Two-Thirds of Pending DOJ Civil
Fraud Cases, GAO Finds, Health News Daily, Aug. 13, 1998, at 5, [hereinafter
Health Fraud Comprises] ("The Window Project addresses billing for outpatient
services within 72 hours of a hospital admission that are included in the
inpatient prospective payment rate.").




n114.  See Himali, supra note 111 (this project is also known as "Operation Bad
Bundle"); Health Fraud Comprises, supra note 113, at 2 ("The Lab Unbundling
Project focuses on inappropriately high payments for tests that are performed
concurrently on automated equipment.").




n115.  See Himali, supra note 111, at 50 (targeting over 130 teaching hospitals
under PATH as of the end of 1997, "the government is investigating Medicare Part
B billings by teaching physicians for services performed by interns and
residents").




n116.  See id. at 51 (project investigates "hospitals that bill consistently for
complex pneumonia, which has a significantly higher DRG than simple pneumonia");
Feds Eye Circumstances, Clinical Pathways in DRG Upcoding False Claims Cases,
Physician Manager, Oct. 2, 1998, at 12 ("DRG upcoding is shaping up into a major
national false claims investigation. The feds say some hospitals exaggerate
patients' symptoms and secondary diagnoses to bill Medicare for a more-lucrative
version of the correct DRG. Examples: pneumonia and septicemia.").




n117.  See Himali, supra note 111, at 52:



   At issue in the transfer/discharge initiative is when a patient is
transferred from one hospital to another but it is reported as having been a
discharge so that the first hospital the patient was admitted to receives the
full DRG payment as opposed to what the hospital should have received - a per
diem amount based on the number of days the patient was at the hospital, not to
exceed the full DRG. The second hospital the patient is transferred to should
receive the full DRG. "If the [Medicare] program is billed for two full DRGs,
there has been a false claim."




n118.  See 31 U.S.C. 3729-33 (1994). See generally Patricia Meador & Elizabeth
Warren, The False Claims Act: A Civil War Relic Evolves Into a Modern Weapon, 65
Tenn. L. Rev. 455 (1998); Marc S. Raspanti & David M. Laigaie, Current Practice
and Procedure Under the Whistleblower Provisions of the Federal False Claims
Act, 71 Temp. L. Rev. 23 (1998).




n119.  See Thomas E. Bartrum & L. Edward Bryant, The Brave New World of Health
Care Compliance Programs, 6 Annals Health L. 51 (1997); Karen Boxer & Helaine
Gregory, Compliance is Good for Your Corporate Health, 1057 PLI/Corp 711 (1998);
Health Attorneys See Rapid Growth in Adoption of Compliance Plans, 5 Health L.
Rep. (BNA) 33, d5 (1996). See also sources cited infra note 153. In the past
eighteen months, the Office of the Inspector General issued six model compliance
plans for guidance to the health care industry. See OIG Compliance Program
Guidance for Clinical Laboratories, 63 Fed. Reg. 45076-03 (1998); OIG Compliance
Program Guidance for Hospitals, 63 Fed. Reg. 8987-02 (1998); OIG Model
Compliance Plan for Clinical Laboratories, 62 Fed. Reg. 9435-01 (1997).




n120.  1 1995 JCAHO Manual, supra note 101, at 23.




n121.  Changes in Accreditation Thrust Ethics Committees into New Roles, Med.
Ethics Advisor, Jan. 1995, at 1 [hereinafter Changes in Accreditation].




n122.  See 15 U.S.C. 52-55 (1996).




n123.  See Two Diet Companies Contest FTC Claims; Three Others Resolve False Ad
Charges, 65 Antitrust & Trade Reg. Rep. 460 (1993); Very-Low-Calorie Diet
Program Marketers Settle FTC Deceptive Advertising Charges, 64 Antitrust & Trade
Reg. Rep. 343 (1993).




n124.  See FTC Is Probing Marketing of Health Care Including Claims by
Infertility Services, 62 Antitrust & Trade Reg. Rep. 283 (1992).




n125.  See Cancer Treatment Centers Settle FTC Allegations over Ad Claims, 5
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 12, d22 (1996).




n126.  See 56 Fed. Reg. 56228 (1991) (proposed consent agreement with analysis
to aid public comment, requiring Minneapolis cosmetic surgeon to disclose risks
and have scientific evidence supporting his claims for benefits of liposuction
procedure).




n127.  See 57 Fed. Reg. 26848 (June 16, 1992) (proposed consent agreement with
analysis to aid public comment concerning NME Hospitals, d/b/a/ Continent Ostomy
Centers).




n128.  See Obesity Treatment Ad Touting Prozac Violates Medical Practice Act, 6
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 2, d28 (1997).




n129.  See Hospital Settles FTC Deception Charges, Won't Misrepresent Ileostomy
Rates, 62 Antitrust & Trade Reg. Rep. 756 (1992).




n130.  2 1995 JCAHO Manual, supra note 101, at 23.




n131.  Id.




n132.  State law theories of abandonment, negligence, or intentional or
negligent infliction of emotional distress can create hospital liability for
denial of treatment or premature discharge. See, e.g., Muse v. Charter Hosp. of
Winston-Salem, 452 S.E.2d 589, 594 (N.C. Ct. App. 1995) (holding that hospital
owed duty not to institute policy or practice which requires that patients be
discharged when their insurance benefits ran out). In 1994, the Health Care
Financing Administration (HCFA) published a final rule that makes it a condition
of participation in Medicare hospitals to have a discharge planning process for
patients. See 42 C.F.R. 482.43 (1998). HCFA was concerned that lack of adequate
discharge planning might result in "systematic underservice of beneficiary
needs", which its requirements were designed to guard against. Medicare: HCFA
Publishes Final Rule on Hospital Discharge Planning Process, Daily Rep. for
Executives, Dec. 13, 1994, at 237 d12. Interestingly, HCFA expressly found that
compliance with JCAHO accreditation standards for discharge planning satisfy the
new rule. See 42 C.F.R. 482.43 (1996).




n133.  See, e.g., Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act of 1986, 42
U.S.C. 1395dd (1994). See also supra notes 15, 16, 19 and accompanying text.




n134.  Both individual and institutional providers may be subject to the
Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, prohibiting discrimination by public
accommodations on the basis of disability in the provision of their services.
See 42 U.S.C.A. 12101-17 (1995). Discriminatory refusals to treat HIV-infected
patients may be challenged under the ADA. See, e.g., Bragdon v. Abbott, 524 U.S.
624 (1998) (holding that HIV infection is a "disability" under the ADA, even if
the infected individual appears asymptomatic); U.S. v. Morvant, 898 F. Supp.
1157 (E.D. La. 1995) (holding that dentist unlawfully discriminated by referring
out HIV-positive patients); Woolfolk v. Duncan, 872 F. Supp. 1381 (E.D. Pa.
1995) (holding that physician may not deny medical services to HIV-infected
patients); Howe v. Hull, 873 F. Supp. 72 (N.D. Ohio 1994) (holding that the
hospital and physician violated ADA by pretextual refusal to admit HIV-infected
patient). See generally Lawrence O. Gostin et al., Disability Discrimination in
America: HIV/AIDS and Other Health Conditions, 281 JAMA 745 (1999).




n135.  The Office of the Inspector General was so concerned about the prospect
(and reports) of hospitals providing financial incentives to doctors to reduce
the amount of care they provide patients that it proposed a specific rule
allowing civil monetary penalties against (1) a hospital "who knowingly makes a
payment, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, to a
physician as an inducement to reduce or limit services provided to an individual
who is eligible for Medicare or Medicaid benefits and who is under the direct
care of the physician that knowingly accepts receipt of such payment," and (2) a
physician who knowingly receives such a payment.  59 Fed. Reg. 61571, 61574
(1994). Critics of the proposed rule argued that "its vague wording could
jeopardize almost any hospital incentive plan under managed care - including
capitation's withholds and risk pools." Julie Johnsson, No Incentives to Limit
Care: New Federal Rule Bans Hospitals from Encouraging Reduced Services, Am.
Med. News, Dec. 26, 1994, at 1, 24. The Final Rule allows civil penalties
against physicians who do not meet Medicare/Medicaid requirements for incentive
plans. See 42 C.F.R. 1003.100 (1998). In turn, the Medicare/Medicaid
participation requirements state that a specified insurer "may operate a
physician incentive plan only if ...no specific payment is made directly or
indirectly under the plan to a physician or physician group as an inducement to
reduce or limit medically necessary services ...." 42 C.F.R. 417.479 (1998).
Recently, the OIG said in a special advisory bulletin that a common hospital
practice known as "gainsharing" - whereby hospitals financially reward
physicians who help achieve cost-savings for the hospitals - implicated these
concerns and was illegal under 42 U.S.C. 1128A(b)(1) and (2). See Katherine E.
Harris & Barbara Yuill, IG Strikes Down Gainsharing, Says CMP Law Bans
Incentives to Curb Care, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1133 (1999). See generally D.
McCarty Thornton & Kevin G. McAnaney, Recent Commentary Distorts HHS IG's
Gainsharing Special Advisory Bulletin, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1522 (1999).




n136.  See, e.g., American Medical Association, Council on Ethical and Judicial
Affairs, Ethical Issues in Managed Care, 273 JAMA 330, 330-35 (1995) ("In their
zeal to control utilization, managed care plans may withhold appropriate
diagnostic procedures or treatment modalities for patients."); Kevin Grumbach et
al., Primary Care Physicians' Experience of Financial Incentives in Managed-Care
Systems, 339 New Eng. J. Med. 1516 (1998) (in one study, 57% of surveyed primary
care physicians reported that they were being rewarded by managed care
organizations for limiting referrals, and 17% of those believed this compromised
the quality of patient care); Alan L. Hillman, Financial Incentives for
Physicians in HMOs: Is There a Conflict of Interest?, 317 New Eng. J. Med. 1743
(1987); Alan L. Hillman et al., How Do Financial Incentives Affect Physicians'
Clinical Decisions and the Financial Performance of Health Maintenance
Organizations?, 321 New Eng. J. Med. 86, 86-92 (1989); Marc A. Rodwin, Conflicts
in Managed Care, 332 New Eng. J. Med. 604, 605 (1995) ("Many financial
incentives for physicians to control costs create conflicts of interest that
compromise the interests of patients. Most [HMOs and a few PPOs] increase or
decrease a physician's compensation depending on the cost implications of his or
her clinical choices or the organization's profitability."); supra note 27.




n137.  Some studies find a difference in the provision of treatment to patients
depending upon the payment systems for the providers. See, e.g., John Rapoport
et al., Resource Utilization Among Intensive Care Patients: Managed Care vs.
Traditional Insurance, 152 Arch. Int. Med. 2207 (1992); Sheldon Retchin et al.,
Outcomes of Stroke Patients in Medicare Fee for Service and Managed Care, 278
JAMA 119 (1997). Other studies have found little or no difference in the care
provided to patients under different payment systems. See, e.g., Derek C. Angus
et al., The Effect of Managed Care on ICU Length of Stay: Implications for
Medicare, 276 JAMA 1075 (1996); Geri Aston, Study: HMO Hospital Stays Same as
Fee for Service, Am. Med. News, Nov. 3, 1997, at 6; Sheldon Greenfield et al.,
Outcomes of Patients with Hypertension and Non-Insulin-Dependent Diabetes
Mellitus Treated By Different Systems and Specialties: Result from the Medical
Outcomes Study, 274 JAMA 1436 (1995). Some studies have suggested that the
provision of less care due to financial incentives may result in improved
quality of care. See e.g., Daniel J. Cher & Leslie A. Lenert, Method of Medicare
Reimbursement and the Rate of Potentially Ineffective Care of Critically Ill
Patients, 278 JAMA 1001 (1997). See generally Barry R. Furrow, Regulating the
Managed Care Revolution: Private Accreditation and a New System Ethos, 43 Vill.
L. Rev. 361, 384 (1998) (collecting many studies and concluding that the
evidence "supports claims that managed care has substantial advantages over FFS
[traditional fee-for-service payment] plans not only in controlling costs, but
also in maintaining or even improving the quality of care for subscribers").
Many observers have called for more research to determine the actual effects of
financial incentives on quality of patient care. See, e.g., R. Adams Dudley et
al., The Impact of Financial Incentives on Quality of Care, 76 Millbank Q. 649
(1998); Patrick H. Mattingly, Observations From the Field: Effects of Financial
Incentives on Quality of Care, 76 Millbank Q. 733 (1998); Steven D. Pearson et
al., Sounding Board: Ethical Guidelines for Physician Compensation Based on
Capitation, 339 New Eng. J. Med. 689 (1998).




n138.  The explosion in litigation in this area has been matched by the amount
of academic writing on it in recent years. For just a few of the array of
articles collecting court cases and discussing the effect of federal ERISA
preemption on this ligitation, see, for example, Brian P. Battaglia, The Shift
Toward Managed Care and Emerging Liability Claims Arising from Utilization
Management and Financial Incentive Arrangements Between Health Care Providers
and Payers, 19 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 155 (1997); Jose L. Gonzalez, A Managed
Care Organization's Medical Malpractice Liability for Denial of Care: The Lost
World, 35 Hous. L. Rev. 715 (1998); Peter D. Jacobson & Scott D. Pomfret, Form,
Function, and Managed Care Torts: Achieving Fairness and Equity in ERISA
Jurisprudence, 35 Hous. L. Rev. 985 (1998); Jeffrey E. Shuren, Legal
Accountability for Utilization Review in ERISA Health Plans, 77 N.C. L. Rev. 731
(1999).

   HMO denials of medically necessary or medically appropriate care have
received considerable negative publicity, see supra note 28, and have been the
subject of numerous lawsuits. During the fall of 1999, a series of class actions
against HMOs was initiated across the country for alleged violations of federal
law under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations (RICO) Act and the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA). See Plan Liability: Class
Actions Against HMOs Climb as 'REPAIR Team,' Physicians File More Suits, 8
Health L. Rep. (BNA) 1887 (Dec. 2, 1999). Individual actions brought under
various federal and state law theories are also increasingly common. See, e.g.,
In re U.S. Healthcare, 193 F.3d 151 (3d Cir. 1999) (allowing negligence claims);
Giles v. NYLCare Health Plans, 172 F.3d 332 (5th Cir. 1999) (allowing vicarious
liability and negligence claims); Dukes v. U.S. Healthcare, 57 F.3d 350 (3d Cir.
1995) (allowing negligence and malpractice claims); Moscovitch v. Danbury Hosp.,
25 F. Supp. 74 (D. Conn. 1998) (allowing negligence claim); Drolet v.
Healthsource, 968 F. Supp. 757 (D. N.H. 1997) (allowing misrepresentation claim
under ERISA); Petrovich v. Share Health Plan of Ill., 719 N.E.2d 756 (Ill. 1999)
(allowing vicarious liability claim); Neade v. Portes, 710 N.E.2d 418 (Ill. App.
Ct. 1999) (allowing breach of fiduciary duty claim); Pappas v. Asbel, 724 A.2d
889 (Pa. 1999) (allowing negligence claim) cert. pet. filed, 67 USLW 3717
(1999). Although numerous state laws already exist that could be used to address
wrongful denials of benefits, one problem for plaintiffs has been that courts
have often interpreted ERISA to pre-empt these state law claims. See, e.g.,
Andrews-Clarke v. Travelers Ins. Co., 984 F. Supp. 49 (D. Mass.1997):



   This case, thus, becomes yet another illustration of the glaring need for
Congress to amend ERISA to account for the changing realities of the modern
healthcare system... ERISA has evolved into a shield of immunity that protects
health insurers, utilization review providers, and other managed care entities
from potential liability for the consequences of their wrongful denial of health
benefits.



    See generally Margaret G. Farrell, ERISA Pre-Emption and Regulation of
Managed Health Care: the Case for Managed Federalism, 23 Am. J.L. & Med. 251
(1997); Peter D. Jacobson, Legal Challenges to Managed Care Cost Containment
Programs: An Initial Assessment, 18 Health Affairs 69 (1999). Some plaintiffs
have recently avoided having their state law claims against HMOs preempted by
ERISA by characterizing their actions as challenges to the quality of medical
care they received or as medical negligence, rather than as a denial of
benefits. See Robert Pear, Series of Rulings Eases Constraints on Suing
H.M.O.'s, N.Y. Times, Aug. 15, 1999, at A1.




n139.  Whether patients will be allowed to sue their health plans under state
law theories, or whether such claims will continue to be preempted by ERISA,
remains one of the most debated issues in managed care reform and proposals for
patient protection legislation. See Susan Webster, Managed Care Regulation Tops
1999 Health Issues List; Fraud Crackdown Ranked Second, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 5
(1999) (managed care reform is the number one health law issue for 1999, with
ERISA preemption being a major component of the debate); see also Aston, A Big
Win, supra note 23 ('biggest area of disagreement is whether people with
employer-based health coverage should be able to sue their health plan for
malpractice if they think the plan has denied them a medically necessary
benefit"); Geri Aston, Health Plan Liability Erupts at Center of House Battle,
Am. Med. News, Sept. 27, 1999, at 1 ("the battle over managed care patient
protections in the House has boiled down to one issue: health plan liability").
While so far only a few states, such as Texas and Georgia, have enacted laws to
allow HMOs to be sued for their coverage decisions such as denials of benefits,
31 states have indicated that health plan liability will continue to be a high
priority issue in their legislatures during the coming year. See Stephen
Piontek, Life or Money?, Nat'l Underwriter Life & Health - Fin. Serv. Ed., Aug.
3, 1998, at 49 ("The nub of all the disputing over patient protections going on
in Congress now really comes down to whether patients should be allowed to hold
their health plans legally liable for adverse decisions."); State-By-State
Report, supra note 24; see also supra note 29. Although numerous state laws
already exist that could be used to address wrongful denials of benefits, the
problem has been that federal ERISA law has been interpreted to preempt these
state law claims. See generally Farrell, supra note 138.




n140.  2 1995 JCAHO Manual, supra note 101, at 23 ("The governing body needs to
review relationships carefully and ensure that its mission to its patients and
community is not harmed by any contractual relationship... The proposed contract
is approved or rejected based on best-bid practices and the potential for
conflict of interest."). Some areas where conflicts may arise in a health care
institutional setting are relationships between a hospital pharmacy and drug
companies, and an institution's financial interests in the research conducted on
its premises. See, e.g., Ezekiel J. Emaneul & Daniel Steiner, Sounding Board:
Institutional Conflict of Interest, 332 New Eng. J. Med. 262 (1995) ("Financial
conflicts of interest in a research setting can adversely affect patient care,
teaching, and research... Less attention has been paid to the conflicts of
interest that arise when health care institutions have a financial stake in the
research conducted in their laboratories and clinics."); Managed Care, supra
note 105, at 126:



   The conduct of hospital pharmacists and physicians who sit on hospital
formulary committees that review and determine hospital drug supplies can be
compromised by drug company marketing enticements... The capacity for drug
companies to influence hospital formulary development is just one of many
reasons why it is incumbent upon hospitals to develop a code of ethical
behavior.




n141.  See American Hospital Association, Management Advisory: Resolution of
Conflicts of Interest (1990):



   Duality of interest can raise the potential for a conflict of interest when
the personal interests of institutional officials come in conflict with the
interests of the institution... The laws of the various states prohibit or
severely restrict actions made under a conflict of interest by a fiduciary, that
is, an individual occupying a special position of trust and responsibility.
Officers, governing board members, and in some states other officials of health
care institutions should be guided by the laws governing a fiduciary. Ethics are
supported by these laws.



    See also Boston Children's Heart Found., Inc. v. Nadal-Ginard, 73 F.3d 429
(1st Cir. 1996) (former president of a nonprofit corporation breached his
fiduciary duty by failing to disclose to the board that he was the director of
another organization performing work in the same general area at the same
hospital where he worked on behalf of the corporation); Mary v. Lupin Found.,
609 So.2d 184 (La. 1992) (holding that cause of action for breach of fiduciary
duties is made out upon allegations that inside directors of a nonprofit
corporation sold a hospital (the corporation's principal asset) for $ 5 million
less than its actual value and secretly structured an improper side deal with
the prospective purchaser).




n142.  See 42 U.S.C. 1320a-7b(b) (soliciting or receiving illegal remuneration);
see also 42 U.S.C. 1395nn (prohibiting "physician self-referrals," or referrals
to providers in which referring physician has a financial interest).




n143.  The OIG has issued ten "Special Fraud Alerts" to the health care industry
warning of potential enforcement targets and addressing the following topic
areas that could violate the anti-kickback statute: joint venture arrangements;
routine waiver of Medicare Part B co-payments and deductibles; hospital
incentives to referring physicians; prescription drug marketing practices;
arrangements for the provision of clinical laboratory services; home health
fraud; fraud and abuse in the provision of medical supplies to nursing
facilities; fraud and abuse in the provision of services in nursing facilities;
fraud and abuse in nursing home arrangements with hospices; and physician
liability for certifications in the provision of medical equipment and supplies
and home health services. See 59 Fed. Reg. 65373 (1994) (publishing first five
alerts, addressing prescription drug marketing schemes, physician investors in
joint ventures, waivers of co-payments or deductibles, hospital incentive
payments to physicians, and clinical lab services); Dept. of Health and Human
Serv, Office of the Sec., Office of Ins. Gen., Special Fraud Alerts, (visited
March 13, 1999) <http://www.hhs.gov/progorg/oig/frdalrt/index.htm>.




n144. " The hallmark of professionalism is self-regulation," said AMA's then
Executive Vice-President James Todd, M.D. Perrone, supra note 100, at 3.




n145.  EMTALA provides a good example, for there is evidence that government
enforcement has been insufficient to prevent ongoing violations of the statute
and persistent patient-dumping practices. See Dame, supra note 19, at 11-21;
Scaduto, supra note 16, at 968-75. Fraud and abuse enforcement is another
example. While in 1997 the DOJ did recover $ 1.2 billion in settlements and
judgments, hired an additional 285 attorneys and agents devoted exclusively to
health care fraud, and opened more than 4,000 civil fraud cases (nearly double
the number from the year before), see DOJ Recovered, supra note 110, these
efforts address only a fraction of the overall loss to the federal government
through erroneous payments to providers, see Kristen Hallam, HCFA Raises the Bar
for Fraud Detection, Modern Healthcare, Feb. 15, 1999 (reporting that an audit
by the Department of Health and Human Services of Medicare overpayments revealed
that $ 20.3 billion (11%) of all Medicare payments in 1997 were erroneous
overpayments; the error rate decreased in 1998, down to 7%, or $ 12.6 billion,
in overpayments). Federal enforcers know that they are targeting only the tip of
the iceberg in bringing civil and criminal actions, and they have relied on a
variety of forms of self-help and self-policing, including reliance on (1)
so-called whistleblowers to bring qui tam actions under the False Claims Act,
see supra note 118, (2) the voluntary corporate compliance programs described in
this essay, and (3) voluntary disclosures by health care organizations who
discover illegal conduct. See Aaron M. Altschuler et al., Health Care Fraud, 35
Am. Crim. L. Rev. 841 (1998). The OIG has initiated a Provider Self-Disclosure
Protocol to encourage providers to voluntarily disclose violations of the fraud
laws. See 63 Fed. Reg. 58399 (1998); see also OIG's website (visited Dec. 12,
1999) <http://www.hhs.gov/progorg/oig> (voluntary disclosure will not
necessarily protect providers from civil or criminal action, but self-reporting
"could be a mitigating factor in OIG's recommendations to prosecuting
agencies").




n146.  See supra note 105 and accompanying text.




n147.  See Mary J. Pitzer, Health-Care Firms Realizing Need to Clear Up Ethical
Fuzzy Areas, L.A. Times, June 8, 1998, at D22 ("Although these [corporate
compliance] programs start with regulatory compliance, they often don't end
there. Billing problems, financial conflicts of interest, harassment and
staffing levels all can fall under the ethics umbrella. And they all ultimately
affect quality of care if resources are diverted from patient care.").




n148.  See Leonard J. Weber, The Ethics of Health Care Advertising, Mich. Hosp.,
Dec. 1988, at 29, 31 (discussing the distinction between a "personal integrity"
model of ethics (which tends to be law's focus) and a "social impact" model of
ethics). Weber observes:



   The 'personal integrity' approach to business advertising focuses on the
relationship of advertising to truth-telling and to individual freedom, two
important values in personal ethics... [Under this approach,] Advertising should
not be deceptive or make false claims... Advertising should not be so
manipulative that individuals cannot resist... The 'social impact' approach to
business ethics... insists... that there are other important ethical concerns as
well, that it is not sufficient to be concerned about manipulation or deception.



    Id. The author goes on to discuss advertising that may promote harmful
practices, create needs, or reinforce harmful stereotypes:



   It is important to ask what message is being communicated and received about
health care when a hospital advertises its childbirth services by stressing the
medical complications associated with labor and delivery. It is important to ask
what message is being communicated and received when a hospital's advertising
stresses the life-saving 'miracles' that take place because of the latest in
high-technology medicine. It is important to ask what the impact of these
messages is on the public's expectations of the kind of health care they can
expect to receive.



    Id. at 31-32.




n149.  Changes in Accreditation, supra note 121, at 7.




n150.  Certainly the trade journals for the health care industry are full of
reports of fraud enforcement activities and strategies for responding. See,
e.g., Sarah A. Klein, Protection or Persecution?, Am. Med. News, Feb. 15, 1999
(providing a sampling of health care providers who have been "snared in the
False Claims net"); John G. Malcolm & Robert F. Schroeder, Health Care Fraud:
What Do You Do When the Government Knocks?, Ga. St. Bar J., Oct. 1998, at 22-30;
Molly Tschida, In the Line of Fire: The Feds Take Aim at Doctors' Billing
Practices, Modern Physician, June 29, 1998, at 23; Top Fraud Cases to Watch in
1999, 8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 98 (1999) (identifying the top ten health care
fraud cases across the country predicted to make headlines this year). But even
the popular press is full of stories of the government crackdown on health care
fraud. See, e.g., Peter Eisler, Fed's War Against Health Fraud Escalates, USA
Today, Feb. 23, 1998, at 5B; Gloria Lau, Gotcha! A Swarm of Federal Inspectors
Is Descending on the Nation's Doctors, Hospitals, and Health Plans, Forbes, May
18, 1998, at 130; Robert Pear, Medicare Fraud Weapon: Patients/Health-Care: The
Government Will Ask Them to Report Their Doctors and Hospitals If They Suspect
Billing Problems, Orange County Reg., Feb. 21, 1999, at A29.




n151.  For a discussion contrasting two approaches to corporate compliance
programs, one that assimilates compliance into corporate culture and one that is
"superimposed as a bureaucratic replacement for clear conscience," see William
Nolan, Corporate Compliance, Corporate Culture: A Way to Avoid Having 'the
Lawyers' Run Health Care Organizations, Behavioral Health Mgmt., Jan.-Feb. 1998,
at 34. See also Pitzer, supra note 147 ("'To have just a compliance-driven
program will not ultimately be successful... Ethics without compliance is a
program without teeth. Compliance without ethics is a program that employees
will not buy into.'").




n152.  See, e.g., Corporate Integrity Agreement between National Medical
Enterprises, Inc. (NME) and the Office of the Inspector General, U.S. Dept. of
Health and Human Services (June 29, 1994), at p. 1.




n153.  See generally Klein, supra note 150 (describing how False Claims Act
prosecutions have generated a compliance industry of insurance carriers,
consultants, and newsletters); Sean Martin, Fraud Fears Fuel Growth of
Compliance Programs, Am. Med. News, Dec. 15, 1997, at 3 (describing manuals,
guides, symposia, and the cottage industry of consultants that have sprung up to
address corporate compliance).




n154.  Changes in Accreditation, supra note 121, at 7. More recently, the
Department of Justice has echoed this sentiment. The Deputy Attorney General has
"urged health care lawyers to 'convince your clients to make compliance plans
and good stewardship top priorities.'... Prosecutors will be looking for 'teeth'
in companies' compliance programs, 'not just glossy brochures.'" Justice
Department to Increase Use of False Claims Act To Pursue Hospital Quality of
Care, Health News Daily, Oct. 23, 1998 [hereinafter Justice Department to
Increase]. Unfortunately, perhaps it is only after the DOJ repeats the ethical
exhortations of JCAHO that health care providers will actually take heed.




n155.  See Peter T. Kilborn, In Managed Care, "Consumer" Laws Benefit Doctors,
N.Y. Times, Feb. 16, 1998, at A1:



   Under the banner of consumer protection, legislators are wrestling with the
complaints of specialist physicians who have been losing their patients, fees
and autonomy, those of insurance and managed care companies whose profits have
sunk in competition for patients, and those employers who pay for much of the
coverage... ["]The quip going around is that this is physician protection, not
consumer protection."



    See also Kassirer, supra note 94 (Kassirer, expressing skepticism about the
AAHP's "Putting Patients First" initiative because it has less to do with
protecting patients than protecting managed care companies from increased
federal and state regulation).




n156.  Kilborn, supra note 155, at A1.




n157.  See generally Leonard H. Friedman & Grant T. Savage, Can Ethical
Management and Managed Care Coexist?, Health Care Mgmt. Rev., Apr. 1, 1998, at
56 ("notwithstanding the pervasive cynicism about the state of business ethics,"
the authors propose a model for health care management which combines business
ethics and biomedical ethics, positing that "the values of truth-telling,
avoiding harm, respecting authority, and honoring agreements have a higher
institutional priority than earning short-term profits. In the for-profit world
of managed care, the values of social equity and fairness should be added given
the unique status of health care in our society.").




n158.  The Office of the Inspector General has suggested it may be preferable,
where feasible, to separate the roles of general counsel or chief financial
officer from the role of chief compliance officer, to ensure independent
judgment on behalf of the hospital. See OIG Compliance Guidance for Hospitals,
63 Fed. Reg. 8987-02, at 8993 n.35 (1998).




n159.  To have any effect within a health care organization, a compliance office
must have high-level authority and be able to exercise independent judgment, a
tall order for any employee charged with uncovering his or her employer's
ethically or legally questionable conduct. See Kirsten Hallam, A Compliance
Problem: HHS, Others Rule out CFOs, Counsels as Ethics Czars, Modern Healthcare,
Oct. 5, 1998, at 116 (Columbia/HCA's head of compliance said that a "compliance
officer should look at a situation without assuming the company is right and
without assuming management's point of view," while Quorum Health Group's head
of compliance observed that a compliance officer has to be "fearlessly"
independent: "you can't always be everyone's friend").




n160.  Interestingly, both JCAHO and the federal government have recently
initiated programs to recruit patients to report potentially questionable
practices by their health care providers. See JCAHO Sets Up Toll-Free Hot Line,
8 Health L. Rep. (BNA) 554 (1999) (toll-free hot line to encourage patients,
their families, and others to "share concerns regarding quality-of-care issues
at accredited health care organizations"); Pear, supra note 150 ("The federal
government will begin enlisting millions of Medicare beneficiaries in its war
against Medicare fraud next week, urging them to report billing errors,
overcharges and other evidence of possible wrong-doing by their own doctors and
hospitals.").




n161.  For an overview of the history, role, and function of hospital ethics
committees, see William S. Andereck, Development of a Hospital Ethics Commitee:
Lessons from Five Years of Case Consultation, 1 Cambridge Q. Healthcare Ethics
41 (1992); George A. Annas, Ethics Committees: From Ethical Comfort to Ethical
Cover, Hastings Center Rep., May-June 1991, at 18-21. See also infra note 166.




n162.  Some hospitals have divided the ethics committees in two, "[one] is for
clincial ethics and the other for organization ethics." John C. Fletcher,
Responding to JCAHO Standards: Everybody's Business, 7 J. Clin. Ethics 182, 183
(1996). Even handling one typical piece of a clinical ethics committee work -
the individual patient case consultation - requires a diversity of people and
strategies which alone can stretch the capacities of committee members to
perform adequately. See Cynthia B. Cohen, Avoiding "Cloudcuckooland" in Ethics
Committee Case Review: Matching Models to Issues and Concerns, 20 J.L. Med. &
Health Care 294 (1992).




n163.  Referring to a 1975 Baylor Law Review article, the court in In re Quinlan
suggested that a hospital ethics committee could assist the family and
physicians in making treatment decisions for incompetent patients. See In re
Quinlan, 355 A.2d 647, 648 (N.J. 1976) ("I suggest that it would be more
appropriate to provide a regular forum for more input and dialogue in individual
situations and to allow the responsibility of these judgments to be shared."). A
later New Jersey court commented, "The suggestion of such a committee traces its
origins to Quinlan, where the court contemplated an 'ethics committee' to
confirm the medical prognosis of the patient and, thereby, to immunize the
doctor and the hospital from civil and criminal liability." In re Jobes, 529
A.2d 434, 463 (N.J. 1987). Although not expressly calling for ethics
"committees", JCAHO began in 1992 in its accreditation standards to require
hospitals to have in place "a mechanism(s) for the consideration of ethical
issues arising in the care of patients, and to provide education to caregivers
and patients on ethical issues in health care." 1 Joint Commission On
Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations, 1992 Accreditation Manual for
Hospitals, Standard RI. 1.1.6.1 (1992). See also Annas, supra note 35, at 6:



   The strategy of using ethics committees to provide 'comfort' for physicians
and others worried about either legal liability or public reaction has
prospered. Ethics committees have grown from an anomalous entity to provide
ethical comfort to a few, to an almost standard entity to provide ethical cover
for many. Without the threat of legal liability and community disapproval (which
could lead to new laws), ethics committees would probably not have developed at
all.



    As suggested in this essay, a similar charge may well be leveled at
corporate compliance programs.




n164.  Corsino, supra note 82, at 177 ("Overreliance on bioethics committees in
meeting JCAHO standards can result in ... a disincentive for clinicians and
administrators to understand and promote patients' rights as a regular part of
daily patient care."). Corsino's observations in the context of medical ethics
concerns is equally apt in the context of organization ethics issues: "If ethics
committees become proxies with sole accountability for [JCAHO] standards, then
hospital staff may never acquire the wisdom, commitment and multi-disciplinary
participation necessary to fully incorporate patient rights into daily patient
care." Id. at 180. When ethics is handled by committee, other problems can arise
as well. See Gregory J. Hayes, Ethics Committees: Group Process Concerns and the
Need for Research, 4 Cambridge Q. Healthcare Ethics 83, 84 (1995) (identifying
various problems with group dynamics, such as a lack of diversity within the
committee, dominance by a few powerful members, drifting away from the original
mission, and failure to consider alternatives adequately in an effort to reach
consensus quickly); Diane E. Hoffman, Evaluating Ethics Committees: A View from
the Outside, 71 Millbank Q. 677, 683 (1993) (noting a concern about potentially
conflicting roles of an ethics committee in trying to serve the interests of
both caregivers and patients); Giles R. Scofield, Ethics Consultation: The Least
Dangerous Profession?, 2 Cambridge Q. Healthcare Ethics 417 (1993) (noting
common criticisms of ethics committees that they are time consuming and
unwieldly and suffer from "group-think" and "non-think").




n165.  See Fletcher, supra note 162, at 182 (observing that "the ethics of
patient care is everybody's business").




n166.  These three functions are frequently viewed as the primary ones for
hospital ethics committees. See, e.g., David C. Blake, The Hospital Ethics
Committee: Health Care's Moral Conscience or White Elephant?, Hastings Center
Rep., Jan.-Feb. 1992, at 6; John C. Fletcher & Mark Siegler, What Are the Goals
of Ethics Consultation? A Consensus Statement, 7 J. Clinical Ethics 122 (1996).




n167.  A case in point may be Columbia/HCA Healthcare Corp. In the wake of
numerous government investigations in recent years:



   [Columbia/HCA says it is now] putting teeth into its new ethics and
compliance program... The new emphasis of Columbia's top management has gone
beyond demonstrating legal and regulatory compliance to establishing a "set of
aspirations in terms of overall conduct that doesn't have to do with the law,"
says Alan Yuspeth, Columbia's senior vice president of ethics and compliance.
"It has to do with what we're about as an organization, what kind of culture we
want to have."



    Vida Foubister, Fostering a New Corporate Culture, Am. Med. News, Aug. 10,
1998, at 12. Some observers remain skeptical, however. George J. Annas believes:
"'It's not a serious attempt to do ethics... It's a serious attempt to avoid
legal liability.'" Id. Whether skeptical or not, health care observers are
watching the compliance programs at both Columbia/HCA and Tenet Healthcare
Corp., whose predecessor National Medical Enterprises paid millions to settle
fraud charges in the mid-1990s, as potential models for genuine attempts to "do
ethics." Pitzer, supra note 147. The government has also urged that
responsibility for ethics as well as legal compliance begin at the top levels of
a health care organization. See Justice Department to Increase, supra note 154
(the DOJ urges "good stewardship" as a top priority); OIG Compliance Guidance
for Hospitals, 63 Fed. Reg. 8987, 8990 n.8 (1998):



   The OIG strongly encourages high-level involvement by the hospital's
governing body, Chief Executive Officer, Chief Operating Officer, General
Counsel, and Chief Financial Officer, as well as other medical personnel as
appropriate, in the development of standards of conduct. Such involvement should
help communicate a strong and explicit statement of compliance goals and
standards.




n168.  See supra notes 105-06, 146-47 and accompanying text.




n169.  See Fletcher, supra note 162, at 183 (observing that accountability for
meeting JCAHO standards does not rest with the ethics committee: "That
obligation clearly falls on the governing body and the most senior
administrators and clinicians."). See also Weber, supra note 148, at 32:



   Management may need to develop an institutional framework for assessing the
ethics of any proposed advertising. The key is to have the right persons ask the
right questions. The right questions are questions about both the content and
the impact of the advertising... The right persons are those who are willing to
ask - and answer - the hard questions, no matter who is proposing or sponsoring
the activity.




n170.  See Annas, supra note 35, at 10. Prof. Annas's suggestion about ethics
committees is equally applicable to management:



   What we might try ... is to engage in a real effort to see if
multidisciplinary committees can "do ethics" and encourage real change in our
hospitals and medical care facilities to go beyond the law and risk management
and to "do the right thing." Good ethics (and a good ethics committee) begins
where the law ends.



    See also Foubister, supra note 167 ("[A] corporate-led compliance program
that goes beyond the minimum required by law is critical to any business,
whether it's defense or health care."); Pitzer, supra note 147 (according to
Alan Yuspeth, senior vice president at Columbia/HCA Healthcare Corp. to over see
its ethics and compliance program: "'At a minimum, we want to ensure compliance
with complex laws and re gulations... But in a larger sense, we want to do the
right thing.'").


